We use cookies to give you the best online experience. See our
Cookie Policy
.
Disagree
Agree
We stand with Ukraine to help keep people safe.
Join us
Privacy Policy
Effective date: 09/01/2021
Hey!
This is the legal bit...
Below is our Privacy Policy. As a company, we’re 100% committed to safeguarding your information. We
                    believe everyone has the right to digital security and protection. This means we take laws around
                    data and privacy very seriously and make sure we fully comply with all of them.
You’ll also find our
Terms and Conditions
here
                    too.
Please read it carefully to learn about your rights, the information we collect, how we use it and
                    protect it.
Please reach out to us with any questions. We’re always super happy to hear from you and want to
                    help you out wherever we can.
You can email
legal@weareclario.com
or feel free to write us a letter and send it to Unit No: 3005-D6, Swiss Tower, Plot No:
                    JLT-PH2-Y3A, Jumeirah Lakes Towers, Dubai, UAE.
1. So, who are we?
We are Clario Tech DMCC! We’re located at Unit No: 3005-D6, Swiss Tower, Plot No: JLT-PH2-Y3A,
                    Jumeirah Lakes Towers, Dubai, UAE (hereinafter "Clario" or "Company"). Clario is a data controller
                    and responsible for any
                    personal data processed. We strictly follow all data protection procedures regarding the security of
                    your personal data. You can read about how we collect and manage your information in this document,
                    our Privacy Policy.
If you are an EU resident, you can contact our EU Representative at
hamburg@weitnauer.net
or contact
                    them in writing at: Weitnauer Partnerschaft mbB, Rechtsanwälte Steuerberater, Neuer Wall 84, 20354
                    Hamburg, GERMANY.
UK residents can contact us at
legal@weareclario.com
.
2. What does this Privacy Policy apply to?
This Privacy Policy applies to the Company’s products, services, and websites (jointly hereinafter
                    the “Services”), namely:
Product (Clario software, Clario mobile application, web browser extensions);
Website:
https://clario.co
as well as any other linked pages and online services offered by the Company (hereinafter
                        jointly known as the “Website”).
3. What kind of data do we process?
Well, this is the data we receive from you when you sign up to use our Services.
We collect certain categories of personal data as described below to provide you with our Services.
Third-party data.
Some of your personal data including your name, email address, the last four digits of the credit
                    card number, the type of subscription you bought, the price, etc. may be processed and provided to
                    us by third-party payment processors, after the checkout stage. Please note we don't process information related to your credit card
                    number or other payment data. Your credit card is passed directly to our payment processor and does
                    not go through our servers.
Account registration data.
You may access our Website without providing any of your data. However, to use the Product you will
                    be required to create a Clario account ("Account") providing us with your name, email address, and
                    password as well as provide our payment processor with your personal details as stated above, and
                    then install it.
You can create a Clario account using your Apple ID or Google account. These services will authenticate your identity and provide you with an option to share certain personal data with us such as your:
Full name;
Email address.
This data will pre-populate our sign up form and allow you to create your account and use Clario Services.
Please note that within an Account creation process we will check if your email address provided is
                    ever compromised in any data leaks. We will also turn on monitoring of related password leaks for
                    your security. You are free to opt out from this on the Account registration stage if you do not
                    want us to enable data breach monitoring.
Data we automatically receive.
When you enter our Website, reply to our emails, or send us your inquiries, in addition to any data
                    you provide us (such as basic contact details including name, telephone number, and email), we may
                    automatically collect some information to optimize your experience when using our Website and
                    improve the Product itself. This includes:
Device information;
User configuration information;
Cookies information. Please read our
Cookie
                            Policy
carefully for more details about the information we collect when you use our Website as well as
                        how to manage cookies;
Browser information.
Data collected via Product.
When you use our Product, we may collect different types of data. This includes:
Name;
Email;
Telephone number;
Information about your device (OS version, serial number, device name, model, MAC address,
                        platform, overall system information);
Device characteristics (type, CPU, RAM, VGA, memory, processor,
                        etc.)
Device location (only for Android mobile operating system). Please note that this data only
                        consists of connected Wi-Fi spot details.
The password to the system (in case of remote fixes);
Information about your apps (e.g. versions, size, date of the last update, etc.), services, and
                        software/hardware you use;
IP address;
Browser information (name; version);
Network details;
Wi-FI spots;
Your Product activity information (including bugs, crashes, or system
                        errors);
Some non-personalized session and interaction data - application
                        events (like first launch, log in, log out, and the like). We collect this data as it is crucial
                        for us to ensure the proper functioning of our Product;
Chat correspondence;
Audio and/or video recording of a call/session;
Static images of your screen, which may be captured during the remote session;
Results of remote fixes;
Results of data breaches, malware, and Disk scan.
To provide you with our Product or its specific features (also known as areas), the Company may use
                    third-party software components. Some of these third-party materials may be subject to other terms
                    and conditions. By accepting our Privacy Policy, you indicate your agreement to the terms and
                    conditions of NordVPN’s
Terms
                        of Service
and
Privacy
                        Policy
, and BitDefender
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Services
while activating and using
                    VPN functionality and antivirus protection respectively.
Help from the experts.
Our experts may offer remote access services to assist in diagnosing and resolving security and
                    privacy issues. In addition, experts will be able to help you fix technical issues and answer system
                    questions related to your device. To perform a remote connection, experts must receive your prior
                    explicit consent to do so. Explicit consent means an individual is clearly presented with an option
                    to agree or disagree with the collection, use, or disclosure of personal data, then unambiguously
                    signal his or her agreement.
Additionally, you can terminate the connection at any time. Experts will describe to you how to
                    disconnect within the session.
The entire process allows the expert to access your device remotely to diagnose any conditions
                    interfering with its security and privacy settings as well as technical performance. They can either
                    repair it or provide advice on the available solutions to fix the issue. By taking advantage of this
                    service, you are giving permission to the expert to log in to your device, which may contain your
                    personal data, files, documents, etc.
We strongly recommend you secure your sensitive files before the expert remotely connects to your
                    device. Please do not leave these files on your desktop. It is your responsibility to make your
                    valuable information inaccessible to prevent any type of data loss or corruption. You can use
                    built-in encryption tools on your device to make your files inaccessible to others.
Here you can find step-by-step instructions on how to do so:
Mac user -
http://www.hongkiat.com/blog/encrypt-mac-folder/
;
Windows user -
http://www.computerhope.com/issues/ch000705.htm
;
In addition, even if you do not secure or encrypt your files and they are stored on your desktop,
                    experts will only search your device to identify security and privacy issues hindering its
                    performance. They will attempt to keep their interaction with your files to a minimum.
When you request help from our experts, they may access your device remotely via third-party
                    software, such as LogMeIn® and TeamViewer. By accepting our Privacy Policy, you therefore accept the
Terms & Conditions
and
Privacy
                        Policy
of LogMeIn® and
Terms & Conditions
and
Privacy
                        Policy
of TeamViewer. Please read all Privacy Policies listed above to make sure you agree
                    with all conditions; otherwise, do not purchase or use our service.
Data breach feature.
Our Data breach check is to enable you to reveal past third-party breaches of your personal data on the dark web and minimise the future risk of abuse of your personal data. Also, an enabled 24/7 Data breach monitor within the Product will notify you whether you have been compromised in new data breaches and if your personal data has been exposed on the dark web based on the email address you submitted.
You may enter your email address(es) you want to check on our Website or within the Product.
The Data breach check or Data breach monitor requires us to transmit the hash of your email(s) to our partner - third-party service provider to check if your email address was involved in a data breach. Our partner never has your email address, only the hash of it. This is an unrecognizable jumble of numbers and letters.
Our data breach service provider will use the hash of your email address only for the purpose of checking if your email address appeared in a data breach. Our partner uses this unique hash to determine which unique code has been violated on a specific website. The partner will check it against its repository of stolen accounts, without knowing who you are, to define if your email address (i.e. the hash email) has been compromised.
Once the check is completed by our partner, we pass its results to you. In order to display your data breaches, we may receive from the partner access to it just to transmit the results of the check to you, i.e., which of your passwords associated with the submitted email(s) have been leaked. Additionally, within the Product only, results of the check may include Social Security number, telephone number, and some digits of your credit card number.
Please note that we do not use or store information about data breaches displayed to you in our files or systems. We only transmit the list of leaks to display them to you via the Website or Product. The data leaks are not stored but only displayed on the Website or within your Product account.
You can, at any time, remove the email address(es) submitted for the check or disable data breach monitoring within the Product.
Instagram Account Linking.
Within this feature, we will check your Instagram account privacy settings, with respect
                    to both two-factor authentication and activity status enablement.
Once you have provided us with your Instagram account details, we will get access to your
                    Instagram privacy settings and tell you if you need to enable two-factor authentication and
                    turn off your activity status.
In order to turn on the two-factor authentication, you will be required to enter your phone number.
                    We will transfer your telephone number to your Instagram account in order to receive the activation code.
                    You will be able to change or delete it in the Instagram settings.
Children’s data.
We don’t process the personal data of anyone below the age of 13 without prior parental consent. If
                    you are under 13 years of age, then please do not use or access our Services. We will delete the
                    personal data of a child aged under 13 which is processed without parental consent. If you are a
                    parent or guardian and discover your child is using our Services, then contact us at
legal@weareclario.com
and request to delete the child’s personal data.
4. Why do we process your data?
We use data for the fast and efficient rendering of services to our customers. Also, we use your
                    data for other reasons such as safety and security, customer support, Company communications,
                    compliance with legal obligations, and also for research and development.
Provide you with our Product.
We process data to provide you with a personalized experience and to maintain and improve our
                    Product. This includes using the data to:
Create and update your Account;
Password recovery;
Enable your access to Product features (areas);
Provide you with expert assistance;
Deliver or install some programs or assistance tools and software;
Help resolve issues related to Clario Services;
Answer your questions and inquiries;
Monitor and improve our expert support;
Perform necessary operations to provide you with a fully functioning Product, such as
                        troubleshooting software bugs and operational problems, to make data analysis, testing, research
                        and to monitor and analyze usage trends.
Safety and security.
We use data to help maintain the safety and integrity of our Services. This includes using data to:
Prevent, detect and combat fraud;
Enforce our
Terms and
                            Conditions
.
Communications and marketing.
We use personal data to communicate with you, i.e., send you notifications (including any
                    information about changes to this Policy), newsletters, alerts, personalized recommendations,
                    tutorials, and other Product related materials.
Moreover, we use collected personal data to provide support and assistance to you, respond to any
                    inquiries you make, and resolve disputes.
If we receive your prior opt-in consent, we may contact you via email to tell you about special
                    offers, promotions, and update you on our products or services. You may opt out of future contact
                    from us at any time by using the method provided in the email (such as clicking on an unsubscribe
                    link), or contacting us via email
legal@weareclario.com.
Feedback.
If you take part in a product preview or test, we expect you to provide feedback on product use and
                    to share your valuable user experience with us as well as any suggestions on further product
                    development. Thus, we may use your personal data in order to conduct interviews with you (including
                    via emails or phone calls), send you satisfaction surveys, research, feedback reminders, and collect
                    your feedback in order to understand your experience and improve our products.
Research and development.
We may use the data we collect for the purpose of testing, analysis, research, statistics and
                    overall development of the product. This also allows us to enhance safety and security and to
                    develop new features.
Also, we may share some of the collected data with third parties only for analysis and statistics to
                    improve our Services.
For instance, we use a third-party analytical tool provided by AppsFlyer Inc. (100 1st Street, 25th
                    floor San Francisco, California 94105, USA) for analytical purposes within the Clario mobile
                    application (hereinafter the “App”).
We may collect and share with AppsFlyer some session and interaction data to research and analyze
                    how you have found our App (for example, which advertiser delivered an ad that led you to our
                    Product in App Store). Also, based on this data AppsFlyer helps us to understand how you use our app
                    as well as improve user-friendliness of our app and to make it easier for you to use (for instance,
                    by providing statistical patterns of our App use). The session and interaction data is collected and
                    shared after being rendered anonymously, and is only evaluated in anonymised, summarised form and
                    used for analytical and statistical purposes only.
In order to receive analytical services from AppsFlyer, we may share such data as:
device type and model, CPU, system language, memory, OS version, Wi-Fi
                        status, time stamp and zone, device motion parameters and carrier;
IDFA (Apple identifier for advertisers), Google Advertiser ID and
                        other similar unique identifiers;
information relating to your actions in the App (like clicks on the
                        ads, ad impressions viewed, the URL from the referring website, downloads and installations of
                        Applications), and other interactions, events, and actions (like registration, login, start
                        trial, purchases made).
Please check the
AppsFlyer Privacy Policy
to
                    get more information on how AppsFlyer processes your data.
We use Analytics for Firebase and Crashlytics - service from Google LLC. (1600 Amphitheatre Parkway,
                    Mountain View, CA 94043, USA) in order to derive App analytics, see how users interact with our App,
                    as well as track and prevent any bug affecting our iOS and Android App.
Firebase services process personal data, but, in most cases, it is limited to so-called “instance
                    IDs”, which are provided with a time stamp. These “Instance IDs” assigned by Firebase are unique and
                    thus allow the linking of different events or processes. This data does not represent personally
                    identifiable information. We process these aggregated data to analyze and optimize usage behavior.
Namely, while you are using our App, certain information may be sent to Google:
device information (like name, type, OS version, and certain hardware
                        information about your mobile device, settings, and language of the device);
unique identifier of App installation;
version and functionality of the App;
time of the crash, the state of the application at the time of the
                        crash, and stack traces.
Data transmitted to Crashlytics neither stored or transferred to other services or resources, nor
                    associated with other data available to Google.
For Analytics for Firebase, Google uses not only the “Instance ID” described above, but also the
                    advertising ID of the end device. You can restrict the use of the advertising ID in the device
                    settings of your mobile device:
For Android: Settings > Google > Ads > Reset Ad ID
For iOS: Settings > Privacy > Advertising > No ad tracking
Please see more information on Firebase and Crashlytics privacy settings here:
https://docs.fabric.io/apple/fabric/data-privacy.html;
https://firebase.google.com/products/analytics;
Google privacy policy is available at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy.
If you do not wish to be tracked by AppsFlyer or transfer information to the Google in the future,
                    you can opt out at any time via:
App settings;
Email to
legal@weareclario.com
.
Also, you may opt out of future transmission of data from your device to AppsFlyer's servers by
                    using the
Opt-Out
                        Button
.
We may anonymize your personal data when you stop using our Services. Anonymous data does not relate
                    to a particular person, so we are unable to re-identify you. However, anonymous data does allow us
                    to improve our Services.
Specific features.
We may use your data to provide you with specific features (areas) of our Product. For instance:
“Browsing”
“Device”
“Network”
For instance, if you use our App on an Android mobile operating system, we will request access to
                    the details on the connected Wi-Fi spot (device location data). This will enable any App features
                    and ensure your secure connection to the public Wi-Fi as well as safe browsing. We only need this
                    data to provide you with the requested functionality of our App. We do not collect or share this
                    data with any third parties.
Compliance with legal obligations.
We collect your data to comply with our legal obligations. Also, we may use the data we collect to
                    investigate or address claims or disputes in relation to the usage of the Services or as otherwise
                    allowed by applicable law, or as requested by regulators or government entities.
5. What are the grounds for data processing?
Before proceeding to the processing of your personal data (as described in section 4) we evaluate
                    the data we collect, then we determine the legal basis of processing. We use the following basis to
                    collect and process your data: performance of a contract, compliance with legal obligations, our
                    legitimate interest, and your consent.
Description of why Company
processes your personal data
(“processing purpose”)
To provide you with the
                                    Product
Safety and security
Communications and marketing
Compliance with legal obligations
Research and development
Specific features
Legal basis for the processing
purpose
Performance of a Contract
Legitimate interest
Performance of a Contract
Consent
Legitimate interest
Compliance with legal obligations
Consent
Legitimate interest
Consent
Categories of personal data used by
the Company for the processing
purpose
Account registration data
Data that we receive
automatically
Data collected via Product
Third-party data
Account registration data
Third-party data
Account registration data
Data collected via Product
Account registration data
Data that we receive
automatically
Data collected via Product
Account registration data
Data that we receive
automatically
Data collected via Product
Account registration data
Data we receive
automatically
Data collected via
Product
Your Consent.
Sometimes we may need to process your personal data for purposes not listed in this Policy. In such
                    cases, we’ll ask for your prior consent before proceeding in order to process your personal data.
                    You may withdraw your consent at any time by emailing us at
legal@weareclario.com.
6. Do we share or disclose your data?
We may share your data with some companies, consultants and contractors we hire to provide limited
                    services on our behalf. These organisations or bodies value data privacy as much as we do. We will
                    only provide those companies with personal data they need to deliver the Service. Also, we may
                    disclose your data if we receive a governmental request and when it is required by applicable law.
                    Or we may share data with your consent.
We do not sell, rent, or trade your personal data to anyone.
We will not sell your personal data to any company or organization, but we may transfer your
                    personal data to a successor entity upon a merger, consolidation or other corporate reorganization
                    in which we may participate or to a purchaser or acquirer of all or a substantial part of Company’s
                    assets to which this application relates. In such an event, we will notify you before your personal
                    data is transferred and becomes subject to a different Privacy Policy.
7. Do we transfer your data?
We may need to process your data outside of your country of residence. We apply measures to protect
                    our data transfers and use all appropriate safeguards such as standard contractual clauses adopted
                    by the European Commission.
8. How do we handle your data?
The security of your personal data is very important to us, and we do our best to keep it secure.
Data security.
We protect your data by using physical, technical, and administrative security measures to reduce
                    the risks of loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration. Please be aware we are
                    not responsible for the privacy policies of other websites and services linked to from our Website.
Data storage.
We will retain your personal data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this
                    Policy unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law.
9. How can you manage your data?
If you would like to access, review, update, rectify, and delete any personal data we hold about
                    you, you may review and manage your privacy settings by:
contacting our experts any time via product chat;
directly via your Account.
Also, you can exercise a right to object or restrict processing and a right to data portability.
You may address inquiries for the execution of these rights to
legal@weareclario.com.
We will process your request immediately upon receipt. However, please note it may take up to thirty
                    (30) days from receipt for your request to be implemented. Once your request is implemented, we will
                    notify you by follow-up email accordingly.
In case you are unhappy with how we handle your data, you have a right to lodge a complaint with a
                    supervisory authority.
Access.
You can request an explanation of the personal data we process about you. Also, you can request a
                    copy of your personal data undergoing processing.
Rectification.
You can correct any inaccurate data about you, or you can update your personal data.
Data portability.
You have a right to receive the personal data concerning you, which you provided to us. You can make
                    a request to transmit this data directly to another data controller in a structured, commonly used
                    and machine-readable format. We will transmit your data directly to another controller in cases
                    where it is technically feasible.
Erasure.
You have the right to delete all personal data you have provided to us. We may retain certain
                    information as required by law and for legitimate business purposes permitted by law.
Restrict processing.
You can request us to temporarily or permanently stop processing all or some of your personal data.
Object processing.
You can, at any time, object to the processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your
                    particular situation. For example, you have a right to object to your personal data being processed
                    for direct marketing purposes.
Lodge complaints.
You have a right to file a complaint with a supervisory authority in relation to the Company’s usage
                    of your personal data.
10. California privacy rights
We make these disclosures to California residents visiting our website which supersede and replace
                    any conflicting disclosures found elsewhere on our website as well as reflecting privacy rights
                    granted by the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) with effect from January 1, 2020.
Opt-out of disclosure for direct marketing purposes.
California Civil Code Section 1798.83 permits California residents to learn the identities of
                    entities sent their personal data for marketing purposes and the categories of information
                    disclosed. You may request such information by emailing
legal@weareclario.com
.
                    Please reference
                    California Privacy Rights in your subject line. You may also write to us at Unit No: 3005-D6, Swiss
                    Tower, Plot No: JLT-PH2-Y3A, Jumeirah Lakes Towers, Dubai, UAE.
Please be aware this opt-out does not prohibit our disclosure of personal data for any purpose other
                    than direct marketing. The data we process and share may include your name, address, email address,
                    and telephone number.
Automatic gathering of information.
We collect data you provide to us online, and through websites of unaffiliated third parties.
Automatic gathering of information by third parties.
When you visit our website, third parties can collect personal data about your online activities
                    over time and across different websites pertaining to your visit to or use of our and other
                    websites.
Do-not-track requests.
California residents visiting our website may request we do not automatically gather and track
                    information pertaining to their online browsing movements across the Internet. Such requests are
                    typically made through web browser settings controlling signals or other mechanisms providing
                    consumers with the ability to exercise choice regarding the collection of personal data about online
                    activities, third-party websites or online services. We currently do not have the ability to honor
                    these requests. We may modify this Policy as our abilities change.
The CCPA rights.
The CCPA has extended California residents' data protection rights. However, we have already
                    guaranteed all these rights and described them precisely in this Policy as well as a means of rights
                    exercising. Please refer below to find out more.
Right to be informed.
Please find a list of personal data we collect about you and your activity, sources and business
                    purposes of personal data collection, and third parties we may share your personal data with in
                    Sections 3 - 7 of this Policy.
Your Right of access, Data portability, and Right to delete are outlined in Section 9 of this
                    Policy.
You can exercise these rights any time by contacting us via:
email
legal@weareclario.com;
Contact
                            us
form.
product chat by addressing your inquiry to an expert.
Non-discrimitation right.
We will not discriminate (including by denying products or services, charging different prices for
                    products or services, providing different quality of products and services) against you for
                    exercising any of your CCPA data protection rights.
Note, the CCPA envisages some specific requirements related to the exercising of these data
                    protection rights. Considering them we may:
respond to your request within 45 (forty five) days of receiving the request;
provide you with personal data we collected about you no more than twice in a 12-month period
                        (categories and specific pieces of collected personal data, business purpose and sources of
                        collection, categories of third parties personal data is shared with);
NOT provide you with personal data if we cannot verify your identity. You shall provide us with
                        sufficient information to verify you as the person about whom we collected personal data to gain
                        access.
                        However, we do consider requests made through your Account sufficiently verified;
NOT transmit your personal data to another entity.
Also, please be aware we are allowed to maintain personal data after a deletion request is received
                    as permitted by the CCPA (for instance, for the purposes of detection of security incidents, repair
                    errors, compliance with legal obligations, transaction completion).
We want to highlight how the Company
does not sell, rent, or trade your personal data to
                        anyone.
11. Changes to this Policy
From time to time, we may amend this Policy in response to changing legal, technical or business
                    developments and we recommend reviewing it to stay up to date. When we update our Policy, we will
                    take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make
                    (via email or by displaying the information within our product or on the website). Find out when
                    this Policy was last updated by checking the “updated” date displayed at the top of this document.
12. Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions concerning our Privacy Policy, don’t hesitate to contact us
                    at
legal@weareclario.com
.
We’d like to stay in touch.
We’ve got something special to share! Enter your contact details below to be among the first to find out
                 about the exciting changes we’ve got in the works as well as to receive special promotions.
I agree to receive news, updates, and marketing offers.
                    Read more in
Privacy
                        Notice
.
Subscribe
This site is protected by reCAPTCHA and the Google
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Service
apply.
ReCaptcha verification failed
Message successfully sent.
We’ll get back to you ASAP!
Connection error, please reload the page!
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://my.nordaccount.com/legal/privacy-policy/:
Noscript Error
JavaScript is disabled
It looks like you have JavaScript disabled, or are using a browser extension which limits JavaScript. This website relies on JavaScript in order to display correctly and properly function.
Please either
enable JavaScript
, or disable any extensions or plugins that interfere with JavaScript and try again.
Privacy Policy - General
Terms of service
General
Subscription Terms
NordVPN
NordPass
NordLocker
NordLabs
Privacy Policy
General
NordVPN
NordPass
NordLocker
NordLabs
Cookie policy
Reports
DSA Transparency Report
Privacy Policy
Last updated: March 19, 2025
This document (“
Privacy Policy
”) explains the privacy rules applicable to personal data and other information collected or submitted when you access, install, or use Nord Services and Websites regardless of the device (computer, mobile phone, tablet, etc.) you use.
The data controller of your personal data, as described in this Privacy Policy, is nordvpn S.A. (address: PH F&F TOWER, 50th Street & 56th Street, Suite #32-D, Floor 32, Panama City, Republic of Panama; email:
privacy@nordaccount.com
) (“
Nord
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
”).
The capitalized words used in this Privacy Policy as definitions are defined here or in our
General Terms
.
By visiting our Websites, by submitting your personal data to us, and by accessing, installing and/or using our Services, you confirm that you have read this Privacy Policy and agree to be bound by this Privacy Policy. If you do not agree with this Privacy Policy or any provisions hereof, please do not use our Services and Websites.
Product-specific Privacy Notices.
As Nord products cater to different user needs, they may process different personal data points during their performance. The following links provide further information on:
NordVPN Privacy Notice (additional terms)
NordPass Privacy Notice (additional terms)
NordLocker Privacy Notice (additional terms)
Additional information on your personal data may also be indicated in contractual terms, supplemental privacy statements, or notices.
PLEASE NOTE:
To help you understand this Privacy Policy, we've included a short summary at the beginning of each section. While these summaries are not legally binding, they highlight the key points of the text using clear everyday language. Be sure to read the full Privacy Policy for all the details.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
GROUNDS FOR PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA
SHARING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
CHOICES RELATED TO YOUR PERSONAL DATA
DATA SECURITY
DATA RETENTION AND DELETION
COUNTRY-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS
CONTACT US
CHILDREN’S DATA
OTHER TERMS
1. PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
SUMMARY:
As per our no-logs policy, we don't track your online activity — but we do need some of your personal data (such as your email address and payment details) to provide our services. You may also voluntarily give us your data in situations that don't involve using our products, such as when you agree to accept cookies on our website or participate in a giveaway. In all cases, we only store the bare minimum of information needed to work with you.
Nord processes personal data to a limited scope to provide Services, process payments for the Services, and enable the functioning of our Websites and mobile applications. We may process the following categories of personal data:
Information for creating your Account
Email address.
We ask for your email address as part of your registration. It is necessary for the creation of your Nord Account, retrieving a lost password, and using the Services.
Subscription information
Subscription data.
When you subscribe to our Services we process certain subscription information (e.g., your email address, the subscription plan you have chosen, subscription term, subscription ID, subscription frequency, amount, currency, status, auto-renewal status, information about enabled/disabled features such as multi-factor authentication (MFA), etc.).
Payment related information
(if using paid Services)
Payment data.
This information is necessary to collect payments for the Services. Our payment processing partners process basic billing information for payment processing and refund requests (e.g., date of purchase, payer’s IP address, postal (ZIP) code, credit card owner's full name and credit card information). We also process some of such billing information ourselves (e. g., date of purchase, credit card owner's full name, part of your credit card number, its expiration date) in cases of recurring payments or when you provide your payment details directly to us.
Country details.
When making a purchase we process information on the user’s country the purchase takes place from. This information is necessary for VAT calculation purposes.
Information for payment fraud prevention.
To prevent fraudulent payments for the Services, your personal data (such as payer's email address and device information) can be verified by our and/or our payment processing partners fraud management tools. A payment transaction that is considered high risk may be rejected by us.
Information concerning zero authorization for billing.
The purpose of the zero authorization is to confirm that your payment method is still valid, which, respectively, leads to a seamless continuation of your Subscription. No personally identifiable information is collected in this case, apart from the fact that your provided payment method is still valid (or not) and the date of such authorization.
Information related to A/B price testing.
The results and/or insights obtained from A/B price testing may be used by Nord to optimize its pricing strategies, improve Service offerings, and/or enhance your experience. This may include the collection of data related to your behavior, preferences, or responses to pricing strategies.
Communication data
Email address.
We use your email address to: i) send you important updates and announcements related to your use of the Services and Websites; ii) respond to your requests or inquiries; iii) send you offers, surveys, and other marketing content (you can opt-out of those at any time).
Customer support inquiries.
We keep the information that you provide to our customer support team that was necessary to resolve the query. Depending on what information is necessary, it can consist of, but not limited to: payment information for customer verification processes, your country name, information of your OS, local application logs, etc.
Communication optimization data.
We use various tools to help us optimize our emailing campaigns. These tools may track actions you perform with an email, such as open it or unsubscribe from further communication. We may also be able to see the user device’s operating system (e.g., Windows, Mac, iOS, Android) and country in order to optimize push and email notifications and automatically set the language.
Chatbot.
If you contact us via our chatbot on our Websites, in addition to processing your contact information, we will be able to collect your device information and IP address.
Live chat widget.
If you contact us via live chat widget, in addition to processing your contact information, we will also process your device information (such as type of the operating system and browser) and IP address. This information is necessary for our support to determine the user's country, prevent abuse,see if the user is connected to our servers, and help our support to process queries faster.
Phone calls.
If phone contact is available in your country and you reach out to us in response to one of our TV advertisements, we will record the call for quality assurance and to respond to your queries (including complaints) about our Services you are interested in, but only with your prior consent. In this case, we will process call metadata (such as your phone number, call time, and duration) along with the content of the call (including your voice, email address, details about our Services you are interested in, and any other information exchanged). Additionally, if your call is dropped while we are locating an available consultant or during your conversation, or if you call when the phone line is closed, we will record your phone number and may call you back. If you prefer not to have your call recorded, we encourage you to contact us via email at
support@nordaccount.com
instead of reaching out by phone.
Information collected on our applications and Websites
Service usage.
We collect information about specific Nord Services (NordVPN, NordPass, NordLocker, etc.) and features you use.
Access logs.
As most websites on the internet, our Websites collect access logs (such as IP address, browser type, operating system) to operate our Services and ensure their secure, reliable, and robust performance. This information is also essential for fighting against DDoS attacks, scanning, and similar hacking attempts.
Cookies.
Cookies, pixels, and other similar technologies are usually small text or image files that are placed on your device when you visit our Websites. Some cookies are essential for our Websites to operate smoothly; others are used to improve Websites’ functionality, analyze aggregated usage statistics to improve Websites’ performance, and for advertising. We also use affiliate cookies to identify the customers referred to our Websites by our partners so that we can grant the referrers their commission. You can check what cookies we use at our
Cookie policy
.
Referrals data
Information for participating in referral programs.
Participation in referral programs maintained by Nord requires referrers to submit personal data (e.g., full name, e-mail address, phone number, relationship with the referred party) about themselves and a referred party so that Nord could i) reach out to the referred party; ii) contact referrers with regards to their participation in referral programs and/or provision of rewards. It is the referrer's responsibility to abide by applicable privacy laws when disclosing third parties’ personal data to Nord, including informing third parties that they are providing referred parties’ personal data to Nord and how it will be used and processed. Referred parties may unsubscribe from any future communication at any time. If you believe that one of your contacts has provided us with your personal data and you would like it to be removed from our database, please contact us.
Promotional games data
Information for participating in our promotional games (e.g., sweepstakes, giveaways, contests).
When you decide to participate in any promotional game that requires additional personal information, you will be explicitly requested to provide it. The personal data we ask you to provide typically includes your full name, e-mail address, phone number, information about the purchased subscription plan. However, you have the right to refuse to provide such information and cease your participation in the promotional game at any time. In certain cases we also may share the mentioned data with third parties that help us to organize/coordinate such promotional games. Please carefully review the terms and conditions of each promotional game in which you participate as they may contain specific additional information about the processing of your personal data. If the terms and conditions of such promotional games concerning the treatment of your personal data conflict with this Privacy Policy, the terms and conditions of such promotional games shall prevail.
Social networks data
Account data.
For the purpose of managing and administering our profiles on social networks (e.g., “Facebook”, “Instagram”, “Twitter”, “LinkedIn”, “YouTube” accounts), we may collect and process your personal data (e.g., full name, social network profile name, pictures, and/or public comments) you provided voluntarily.
2. GROUNDS FOR PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA
SUMMARY:
We mainly process your personal data to provide you with our services and to fulfil legal requirements for our business. In rare situations, we may have to process data to protect our or certain third parties legitimate interests (such as preventing the services abuse). In some cases, we also process your personal data when you give us your consent (for example, when you want to receive our newsletters).
Your personal data is processed:
Where it is necessary to fulfill our contract with you at your request.
Such cases include: i) to provide access to our Services; ii) to process your purchase transactions; iii) to ensure the secure, reliable, and robust performance of our Services and Websites.
When we have a legal obligation to process certain personal data collected from you
(e.g., to keep and process records for tax purposes and accounting).
Where you have provided your consent to us.
Such cases may include: i) to send marketing communication (unless applicable law permits us to contact you without your prior consent); ii) to communicate with you and manage your participation in Nord’s contests, offers, referrals, or promotions; iii) to record your call. Please note that although Nord may also process your personal data for marketing purposes when applicable law permits us to contact you without your separate consent, if you choose not to receive marketing communication from us (i.e., if you opt-out), we will honor your request.
We sometimes may process your personal data under the legal basis of our or third parties’ legitimate interest.
Such cases include: i) to properly administer business communication with you; ii) to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our Services and Websites; iii) to protect against harm to the rights, property, and safety of Nord, our users, or third parties; iv) to improve or maintain our Services and provide new products and features; v) to receive knowledge of how our Websites and applications are being used (crash reports, app store reviews, information about the channel from which our app was downloaded, etc.).
3. SHARING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
SUMMARY:
In some cases, we may need to share personal data with certain third parties, such as trusted service providers, partners, and other Nord group companies. In all cases, we make sure to handle your data safely and respect your privacy — even when it needs to be processed outside of your country.
We do not share your personal data with third parties except as described in this Privacy Policy.
Service providers.
We use third-party service providers to help us with various operations, such as payment processing, email automation, Websites and app diagnostics, analytics, and other. As a result, some of these service providers may process personal data.
Some of our main long-term service providers:
Live chat and support service platform, e.g., Zendesk (provided by Zendesk Inc.), Klaus (provided by Qualitista OÜ)
Emailing service providers, e.g., Iterable (provided by Iterable Inc.), Sendgrid (provided by Twilio Inc.)
Marketing, application analytics and diagnostics, e.g., Google Analytics, Firebase Analytics (provided by Google), AppsFlyer (provided by AppsFlyer Ltd.), Bugsnag (provided by Bugsnag Inc.)
Conversion attribution system, e.g., Hasoffers (provided by Tune Inc.)
Payments processing, e.g., Mollymind AG, NordSec B.V., Moonflash Limited, Lagosec, Inc., Nord Security JP Co., Ltd, Checkout Ltd
Nord partners.
Sometimes our partners, for example, distributors, resellers, and app store partners, will be independent data controllers of your personal data. In such cases, the procedures established by them (e.g., terms of service and privacy policies) will apply to such relationships. In other cases we may collaborate with partners as joint controllers meaning that we jointly define the purpose and means of data processing with them. Both joint controllers are then responsible for the data processing and its compliance with applicable privacy laws.
We also partner with third parties to display advertising on our Websites or to manage our advertising on other sites. These partners help us deliver more relevant ads and promotional messages to you, which may include behavioral, contextual, and generic advertising. We and our advertising partners may process certain personal data to help us understand your preferences so that we can deliver advertisements that are more relevant to you.
Your personal data may be processed in any country in which we engage service providers and partners. When you use our Services and Websites, you understand and acknowledge that your personal data may be transferred outside of the country where you reside.
Bundled subscriptions (Third Party Services acquired through Nord)
. By subscribing to the Bundled Subscription which includes Third Party Services acquired through Nord, you agree that certain purchase information (e.g., your email address, Subscription term, payment amount, subscription ID) will be shared with the respective provider of Third Party Services for purposes of activating, administering, and provision of Third Party Services, also for improving your experience, and communicating with you about the Bundled Subscription and Third Party Services. When you use Third Party Services, your personal data is processed by the provider of Third Party Services (which acts as a separate data controller of your personal data) according to the procedures established by it and governed by its privacy policies.
Other Nord group companies.
We share your personal data with other Nord group companies to carry out our daily business operations and to enable us to maintain and provide our Services to you. We may also share the contact information of Nord business customers (i.e., our customers which use our products as a tool for their business) with Nord group companies for marketing of their B2B products purposes (business users have a right to object to such transfer at any time).
Protection of our rights.
We may disclose personal data to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against any legal claims or other complaints. We may also share such information if we believe it is necessary in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, and violations of our General Terms.
Business transfers.
We may share your personal data in those cases where we sell or negotiate to sell our business or go through a corporate merger, acquisition, consolidation, asset sale, reorganization, or similar event. In these situations, Nord will continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal data.
Requests for data.
Any request for user data should follow an appropriate official legal process recognized by the laws of the Republic of Panama (e.g., mutual legal assistance treaty, letters rogatory). We carefully review each request to make sure it satisfies laws applicable to our company, laws of requesting country, international norms, and our internal policies. However, it is important to note that the laws of the Republic of Panama do not oblige us to store logs of users’ online activity. Accordingly, we do not log users’ browsing history, traffic information, or IP addresses used to access the internet via our services.  This means that we are not able to link shared IP addresses of VPN services to an individual user or otherwise individual users based on data that we do not process. Therefore, even if we were to receive a rightfully served request, it might be impossible for us to identify a specific person or provide any identifying information related to that person. In cases where, following an appropriate legal process, we are obligated to comply with a request and we are able to identify a specific person, we will provide the limited data we process as per our Privacy Policy given it falls within the scope of the request. Contact information for government authorities: nordvpn S.A., address PH F&F TOWER, 50th Street & 56th Street, Suite #32-D, Floor 32, Panama City, Republic of Panama, email
inquiries@nordvpn.com
.
Cross-border transfers of personal data
To facilitate our Services and Websites, we may store, access, and transfer personal data from around the world, including in countries where Nord has operations. These locations may not guarantee the same level of protection of personal data as the one in which you reside. We assess the circumstances involving all cross-border data transfers and have suitable safeguards in place to require that your personal data will remain protected in accordance with this Privacy Policy. For example, in case your personal data is transferred to countries outside the EEA, we make sure there is an adequacy decision from the European Commission with regards to the recipient country or we use standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission for such transfer of your personal data.
4. CHOICES RELATED TO YOUR PERSONAL DATA
SUMMARY:
You have certain rights when it comes to your data processing. You can contact our customer support team at any time if you need help exercising them.
Please note that there are various data protection laws across different jurisdictions that provide privacy rights to you as a data subject. Subject to those applicable data protection laws, among others, you may have the following rights:
Delete
: request us to erase your personal data;
Access
: know and access personal data Nord has collected about you;
Rectify
: rectify, correct, update, or complement inaccurate/incomplete personal data Nord has about you;
Object
: object to the processing of your personal data which is done on the basis of our legitimate interests (e.g., for marketing purposes);
Portability
: request us to provide you with a copy of your personal data in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format or to transmit (if technically feasible) your personal data to another controller (only where our processing is based on your consent and carried out by automated means);
Restrict
: restrict the processing of your personal data (when there is a legal basis for that);
Withdraw consent
: withdraw your consent where processing is based on a consent you have previously provided;
Lodge a complaint
: exercise your rights by contacting us directly or, if all else fails, by lodging a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Rectification.
If you’d like to edit your profile information (e.g., change your email address, add additional username), please contact our support team at
support@nordaccount.com
.
Access.
If you wish to make an access request to provide you with a copy of your personal data, please contact us at
privacy@nordaccount.com
. Please note that you will need to pass through the Account verification process so that we can verify you are the owner of the Account before taking further action on your request.
Deletion.
You can delete your account at any time from your Nord Account. Log in to your Account, navigate to “Account settings” and in the “Account deletion” section click the “Delete account” button. We will ask you to verify this request via email.
Please note that in certain circumstances, additional steps may be required before your Account can be deleted. For example, this may apply if your subscription was purchased via the Apple App Store or if your account is associated with Nord’s business account.
If you are unable to delete your account following the steps provided on Nord Account, please contact us at
support@nordaccount.com
for further assistance.
Additionally, you may also delete your Account in our applications. To initiate deletion, please follow these steps:
Nord Account via NordVPN application on mobile devices
: open the NordVPN app and log into your Account. Tap on the profile icon on the bottom right corner. After that tap “Help Center” tab and you will see a list of options. Choose “Contact us” and select “Request account deletion”. Please note that this action is permanent and you will lose access to all of your services purchased. Tap “Continue” and we will take you to your NordAccount to complete the process.
Nord Account via NordVPN desktop app on Mac
: open the NordVPN app and log into your Account, click on “Help” and select “Email Support”; on our “Contact Us” form select “Request account deletion”, type in “Please delete my account”, and click “SEND”.
Nord Account via NordPass app on mobile devices
: open the NordPass app and log in to your Account, click on “Menu” icon at the bottom right of the window, tap the “Delete Account” option, and confirm by pressing “Submit Delete Request”; you will receive an email from NordAccount customer support to verify your identity and proceed with the Account Removal process.
Nord Account via NordPass desktop application
: open the NordPass app and log in to your Account, click on “Settings”, click the “Delete Account” option, and confirm by pressing “Submit Delete Request”; then, you will receive an email from NordAccount customer support to verify your identity and proceed with the Account Removal process.
Nord Account via NordLocker app
: open the NordLocker app and log in to your Account, click on “Settings” icon, tap the “Delete account”; you will be directed to a new page on your mobile browser, click “Submit a request” at the top right corner, type in a message saying that you wish to remove your Account and indicate the email address your Account is registered with.
Nord's Obligations on Termination.
Upon expiration or termination of your Account and/or Subscription, Nord will immediately cease processing information that’s associated with you. However, please note that there might be cases when we retain information associated with you after expiration or termination of your Account and/or Subscription: (i) all Nord products' databases are connected; after expiration or termination of your Account, basic information (such as your email address) would still be visible in our system in case you have another existing Account associated with a different Nord product (e.g., if we delete your NordPass Account, your email address would still be visible in our system if you have a NordVPN or NordLocker Account). In order to delete all of your data, we would need to delete all of your Accounts associated with different Nord products (in order to do so, please contact our support team); (ii) Nord also may retain information associated with you (e.g., payments data) in order to fulfill its obligations as required by applicable laws, regulations, court orders, subpoenas, or other legal processes for archival purposes.
Opt-out.
If you wish to unsubscribe from our communication, you can opt out at any time by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of each email or contacting us at
privacy@nordaccount.com
.
You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level on your device. To disable cookies, follow your browser’s instructions on how to block or clear cookies.
If you do not agree with the processing of your personal data by Nord, please do not use our Services and Websites. You can request us to discontinue processing your personal data, in which case your data will be processed only as much as it is necessary to effect the discontinuation of your use of the Services (e.g., final settlement or deleting all personal data based on your email address), or finalizing other Nord’s legal relationship with you (e.g., record keeping, accounting, processing refunds). Please note that we or our third-party service providers may be obliged to retain your certain personal data as required by law.
To raise any other questions, concerns, or complaints about our privacy practices or about our processing of your personal data, please contact us as provided below (Section “Contact Us”).
5. DATA SECURITY
SUMMARY:
We take your data security very seriously, using a number of protective measures to keep your personal information safe.
We maintain tight controls over the personal data we collect. Our dedicated IT security team has implemented appropriate physical, technical, and organizational measures to protect information about you against accidental or unlawful destruction or accidental loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure, or access and against all other unlawful forms of processing:
Physical Measures.
We control access to our facilities with access cards.We also use security alarm systems and CCTV. We store devices with personal data information only in locked rooms or cabinets. Our printers are protected by access control measures. A clean desk policy is implemented.
Technical Measures.
We use layered defense with firewalls, anti-malware protection, intrusion detection and prevention systems. Our infrastructure is regularly updated and regular vulnerability scans are in place to detect possible vulnerabilities. We have security event and incident management solutions to correlate and investigate signals in security tools. Servers are hardened and automated configuration tools are used to manage them. All workplaces are managed from a centralized endpoint management tool. Data at rest and in transit are encrypted. Encryption protocols are used according to the newest security practices.
Organizational Measures.
We adopted information security and data processing policies according to best practices. We have external audits to prove our information security and data processing policies are up to standards. We adopted a constant development culture of security and data protection awareness among our employees (including organizing regular and ongoing training and other awareness activities).. We analyze the threat landscape and attack surface and constantly update our security measures. Access to databases containing personal data is granted on a need-to-know basis.
If we detect something suspicious, we will notify you immediately and guide you through steps to stay better protected. However, no company can guarantee the absolute security of internet communications as no technology is completely bulletproof. By using the Services and Websites, you expressly acknowledge that we cannot guarantee the 100% security of personal data provided to or received by us through the Services and that any information received from you through Websites or our Services is provided at your own responsibility. If you have any reason to believe that your interaction with us is no longer secure, please notify us at
privacy@nordaccount.com
.
6. DATA RETENTION AND DELETION
SUMMARY:
We only keep your personal data for as long as we need it to provide our services or comply with the law. Once there are no legitimate grounds for holding this information, we'll immediately dispose of it in a secure way.
Nord will keep your personal data only as long as necessary to provide you with the Services, or for as long as we have another legitimate ground to do so, but not longer than permitted or required by law. Some of more specific data retention terms are provided below:
Customer billing information and payment details are kept by Nord for 10 years from the last payment transaction.
Nord will use your email for marketing communication for 1 year after the end of your Subscription or until you exercise your right to opt-out, whichever comes first.
If the call with our support team is recorded, recordings will be retained for a maximum period of 2 years unless further retention is required for legal or compliance purposes.
When we no longer have a legal ground to keep your personal data, it will either be securely disposed of, or de-identified through appropriate anonymization means. Nord will destroy personal data recorded or stored in the form of electronic files using method(s) that would prevent the recovery of the data.
7. COUNTRY-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS
SUMMARY:
While some of your rights are rooted in this Privacy Policy, you may have additional rights available to you depending on your country. If you want to exercise them (or if you want to know more), simply contact us.
For users in European Economic Area (“EEA”)
If you are a resident of EEA countries, you can exercise your rights as provided in the European Union's General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) by contacting us at
privacy@nordaccount.com
.
For users in California
If you are a California resident, you can exercise your rights as provided in the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”) by contacting us at
privacy@nordaccount.com
. As per definitions in the CCPA, please note that Nord does not sell, share, lease, or rent your personal information.
For Users in the Republic of Korea
As set out in Section 3 of this Privacy Policy, we share personal data with service providers and other third parties that may be located outside the Republic of Korea. For users in the Republic of Korea, a detailed list of these third parties, along with additional Korea-specific terms, is provided in the Korean-specific Privacy Policy,
available here
.
8. CONTACT US
SUMMARY:
Legal documents can be tricky. If you have any questions about your personal data or this Privacy Policy (or if you want to exercise your rights), our contacts are provided below.
If you have questions, requests, concerns, or complaints about this Privacy Policy or our personal data processing practices, or you wish to exercise your data subject rights, please contact us via
privacy@nordaccount.com
or by writing to us at the following address:
nordvpn S.A., PH F&F TOWER, 50th Street & 56th Street, Suite #32-D, Floor 32, Panama City, Republic of Panama
On matters related to the processing of personal data, you may also contact our representative, VeraSafe, in the EEA through the following means:
online contact form:
https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative
;
telephone: +420 228 881 031;
postal address: VeraSafe Ireland Ltd., Unit 3D North Point House, North Point Business Park, New Mallow Road, Cork T23AT2P, Ireland.
If you are located within the United Kingdom, you may also contact our representative, VeraSafe, specifically for the United Kingdom, through the following means:
online contact form:
https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative
;
telephone: +44 (20) 4532 2003;
postal address: VeraSafe United Kingdom Ltd., 37 Albert Embankment, London SE1 7TL, United Kingdom.
Nord has also appointed a Data Protection Officer (DPO) to ensure the protection of your personal data. You can contact our DPO at
dpo@nordsec.com
.
9. CHILDREN’S DATA
Nord does not knowingly collect or solicit personal data from anyone under the age of 18. If you are under 18, please do not attempt to send any personal data about yourself to Nord. If we acknowledge that we have collected and processed personal data from a child under the age of 18, we will delete that data as quickly as possible.
10. OTHER TERMS
SUMMARY:
We will do our end to keep your personal data safe, but you are ultimately responsible for your actions online while using our services. In addition, this Privacy Policy does not apply to other websites, even if you got to them by following a link on our page. Finally, this document is not set in stone — but if we do change it in a way that significantly concerns you, we'll let you know.
Limitation of Liability.
To ensure the security of personal data, Nord employs various technical, physical, and organizational security measures; however, it is your responsibility to exercise caution and reason when using the Services and Websites. You will be personally liable if your use of the Services and Websites violates any third party privacy or any other rights or any applicable laws. Under no circumstances is Nord liable for the consequences of your unlawful, willful and negligent activities, and any circumstances that may not have been reasonably controlled or foreseen (please read the
General Terms
for more information).
Links to other websites.
Our Websites may include links to other websites (e.g., social media websites) whose privacy practices may be different from ours. If you access any of those websites via such links and/or submit your personal data to any of those websites, your personal data is processed by the procedures established by them and governed by their privacy policies. We encourage you to carefully read the privacy policy (or other respective privacy notice) of any website you visit.
Prevailing Language.
For all purposes, the English language version of the Privacy Policy shall be the original, governing instrument and understanding between you and us. In the event of any conflict between this English language version of the Privacy Policy and any subsequent translation into any other language, the English language version shall govern and control.
Updates to the Privacy Policy.
We develop our Services and Websites introducing new features or modifying current ones constantly. Therefore, we may need to amend the Privacy Policy from time to time. If the amendments to the Privacy Policy materially affect the activities of our processing of your personal data, we will notify you in advance of such changes by reasonable means (e.g., notification through the respective applications, our Websites, or via email), and we will always indicate the date of the last update. Unless it is stated by us otherwise, each update of the Privacy Policy comes into force as of the moment when the amended Privacy Policy is published on this Website. You are expected to check this Privacy Policy regularly so that you are familiar with the most current wording of the Privacy Policy. Your continued use of the Services and Websites will be deemed acceptance thereof.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.logmein.com/legal/privacy:
Back to Legal
GoTo Privacy Policy
GoTo Privacy Policy
GoTo DPF Notice
Your Choices Regarding Cookies on this Site
We use cookies and other technologies to optimize functionality, gain valuable feedback,  and to ensure that your interactions with our websites and services are simple, secure, and meaningful. To learn more about how we use cookies, please refer to our
Privacy Policy
. You have the ability to manage your cookie settings and preferences by clicking "Cookie Settings". Otherwise, clicking on the website, closing the banner, or clicking "Accept All" indicates you agree to our use of cookies on your device.
Change Settings
Accept All
Reject Optional
Sub-policy 3
https://www.teamviewer.com/en/privacy-policy/:
General
TeamViewer US
Products
Cookie Notice
TeamViewer SE
Brazil (LGPD)
Data Protection Information
General Privacy Notice by TeamViewer
Version as of March 17th, 2025
TeamViewer Germany GmbH and its affiliates (“
TeamViewer
”) take protection of your personal data very seriously. Personal data means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person, such as name, address, email-addresses, IP address, or user behavior etc. The following document (“
General Privacy Notice
”) provides you with information about the processing of personal data in relation to administration of the contractual relationship between us as described and defined in the
End User License Agreement
(“
EULA
”) or any other agreements, as well as all other cases, when you may come in contact with us.
Further to this General Privacy Notice, please refer to our Product Privacy Notices for each of the respective products for detailed information concerning your use of the various TeamViewer products, as defined in the
Product Privacy Notice
.
A. Controller
TeamViewer Germany GmbH (“
TeamViewer
”), Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany is controller pursuant to Art. 4 para. 7 General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) concerning any processing of personal data for which we determine the purpose and means of processing.
Your contracting TeamViewer entity as set out at
https://www.teamviewer.com/en/legal/contracting-entities/
is controller pursuant to Art. 4 para. 7 General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) concerning any processing of personal data for which we determine the purpose and means of processing. TeamViewer Germany GmbH, Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany, is controller for www.teamviewer.com.
B. Data Protection Officer (DPO)
TeamViewer appointed an external data protection officer (DPO). In addition, TeamViewer established a dedicated Privacy team, which closely collaborates with the DPO. The Privacy team as well as the DPO can be reached at
privacy@teamviewer.com
or at TeamViewer Germany GmbH, for the confidential attention of the DPO, Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany.
C. Categories of personal data, as well as purposes and legal basis for the processing
C.1. When you visit our website(s)
TeamViewer has to process certain personal data in order to be able to operate our website(s) and enable you barrier-free access to our content, as well as set certain cookies for the purposes of marketing and retargeting. We do this since we want to ensure that when you visit any parts of our website, your journey will be user-friendly, and especially that you do not encounter technical problems and malfunctions. Also, we would like to make sure we provide you with the most relevant content on our website, which may require that we consider certain personal data such as your browser’s language settings or the country from where you visit our services. In general, when you visit the TeamViewer website, we may collect IP address, date and time of the request, time zone, content of the request, data volume, browser information, your country of origin, as well as operating system as transmitted by your server to our servers.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is our legitimate interest, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR, or in some cases, your consent, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit a), Art. 49 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
Regarding personal data collected and processed in the context of web analytics and (re-)marketing activities as well as our use of Cookies, please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
C.2. When you interact with us
When you contact us (e.g., through an online contact form, through social media, email, chat functionality on our website or via phone), we will collect and process any personal information that you submit, such as your first name, last name, email-address, country, job title, phone number, company information (including company size), subject, description of your query etc. The collection of this data may be facilitated by third-party providers, which e.g., help us to provide particular landing pages or web forms or organize webinars (see Section D below). We will use the collected information for contacting you and serving your request, or to send you our advertising materials, depending on the type of the request and legal basis for the processing.
Depending on the individual case, we may process personal data based on your consent, to perform our contractual obligations under a contract or to follow our legitimate interest, or to fulfil a legal obligation to which we are subject to.
1. When you contact us via website chat or by phone
If you decide to reach out to us via our website chat or a phone, we may process your name, phone number, TeamViewer ID, inquiry type and any other information, that you may provide to us. If you reach us outside of business hours, we may store your message in order to get back to you as soon as possible. We need to process your personal data in order for us to properly respond to your request.
In some countries we utilize so called VoiceBot services, where the customer requests via phone are processed by our internal automated bot, which then automatically creates tickets in our system on your behalf.
The legal basis for processing this personal data in this connection is your request prior to entering into a contract, or already existing contractual relationship, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
Please note, that in some cases we may record phone calls between you and our employees for quality assurance and training purposes. Our employees may also be accompanied by specialized coaches and trainers that may listen in to such calls. We will notify you prior to any activity in this regard (e.g., before or during the call) and ask for your consent in accordance with Art. 6, para. 1 lit. a) GDPR, as well as inform you about other particularities of the processing.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is your consent, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR, which you may withdraw at any time with effect for the future.
2. When you submit a support ticket
If you submit a ticket regarding your TeamViewer product or any similar inquiry (e.g., updating your contact details, termination or renewal requests, commercial usage, technical issues, reverting the trial period, abuse of your license key etc.) using our online support ticketing system, we may process your name, email-address, TeamViewer ID, license key, invoice number, and any additional information you submit in connection with the ticket, depending on the request type. This may include your phone number, country, reason for submitting the ticket, log files compiling connection history, IP addresses, and information on your use of the TeamViewer product, but we will inform you separately in each case about the data that is required to resolve your request. At times, our employees may connect to your device remotely to help you resolve any issues that you may have.
We use our ticketing system to fulfil our business purpose to authenticate our product users and provide service resolution for our customers and free users.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is our contractual relationship with you, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
3. When you request a quote or a demo from us
If you request a quote or a demo for one of our products, TeamViewer will collect and process any information you submit, such as your salutation, first name, last name, address, email-address, company, phone number, country, and product inquiry. We may also store some or all of that information in our customer relationship management system, which is facilitated by a third-party service provider (see Section D below). We require to process your personal data in this connection in order for us to properly respond to your request.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is your request prior to entering into a contract, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
4. When you participate in a survey
If you participate in a survey performed by or on behalf of TeamViewer, we may collect and process your name, email-address, and user experience as well as any other personal information that you submit to us in the survey. Some surveys may be conducted on an anonymous basis, some however may be personalized. In each survey, we will inform you separately about additional personal data collected and processed. The participation in any of our surveys is of course, voluntary.
If you participate in one of our surveys, we may process your personal data to analyze user experience and improve our product.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is your consent to participate in a survey, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit a) GDPR, which you may withdraw at any time with effect for the future.
5. When you participate in a sweepstake
We may, from time to time offer the participation in one of our sweepstakes. For this purpose, we will process your personal data as required for conducting the sweepstake, especially in order to select the winner in accordance with terms and conditions of the respective sweepstake. We will inform you about additional personal data collected and processed within the scope of each sweepstake, respectively.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is your agreement to participate in a sweepstake, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit b) GDPR, which you may withdraw at any time with effect for the future.
6. When you download one of our whitepapers
If you download one of our whitepapers, we may process your name, email-address, and other information as indicated in an individual form of the whitepaper download. If you show interest in our free whitepaper concerning our products, services or general technology updates, we will ask for your consent to subscribe you to our newsletter. You can unsubscribe from receiving such newsletters from us at any time by using the unsubscribe link included in each newsletter.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is your consent, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit a) GDPR, which you may withdraw at any time with effect for the future.
7. When you participate in one of our webinars
From time to time, we may offer our customers, users, and general public to attend our webinars relating to one of our products, modern technological advancements, or our collaborations with various partners. If you register to attend one of our webinars, we may process your name, job title, email-address, phone number, country, company, and other information, depending on the individual webinar. We will ask for your consent to subscribe you to our newsletter in connection with the webinar. You can unsubscribe from receiving such newsletters from us at any time by using the unsubscribe link included in each newsletter.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is our contractual obligation to allow you the participation in the webinar after the registration, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR, as well as your consent to receive the marketing communication from us. You can withdraw your consent at any time with effect for the future.
8. When you contact us on social media
If you visit any of our social media presence (e.g., Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn, Xing) or leave us a comment or question, we may process your social media handle, your email-address, the content that you may interacted with (e.g., likes, shares, chat, documentation etc.) and any other personal information that you may leave on our respective page.
Please also refer to the respective privacy policies of relevant social media platforms:
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Instagram:
https://help.instagram.com/519522125107875
YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Xing:
https://privacy.xing.com/en/privacy-policy
We maintain the social media pages in order to keep in touch with our customers and free users worldwide, to share exiting news and updates about TeamViewer products and services and overall, provide up-to-date information to interested parties.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is our legitimate interest, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
9. When you request information on your personal data processed by us (data subject request)
If you submit a ticket requesting information on our processing of your personal data, we may process your email-address, TeamViewer ID as well as additional information in order to identify you in the first step, as well as, in case if we identify you, gather the personal data that we hold regarding you and provide you with it in a structured manner in accordance with the provisions of GDPR. Within the scope of answering your inquiry, we may process any kind of personal data as identified in our Product Privacy Policies. The processing purpose in this case is to answer your inquiry and to adhere to the legal obligation to which we are subject to.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is our legal obligation, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. c) GDPR, as well as our legitimate interest, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
C.3. When you join our community
If you want to join TeamViewer’s
community
, you will have to sign up and/or sign in with your TeamViewer credentials, such as your email-address, your name, and a password. After the signup, you will be able to interact with other members of the community, as well as our employees.
In TeamViewer’s community, you may comment on different subjects concerning TeamViewer’s activities and products. In connection with your comments or posts in TeamViewer’s community, we may store your name/username (depending on your choice), email-address, IP address, content of your post and any additional information you submit. Further, we collect and process additional information on your comments, e.g., how many comments you post, how other members react to your comments or how valuable your comments are, in order to give certain rewards to TeamViewer community members. TeamViewer will, from time to time, respond to your comments to provide you with more information on any questions that you may have, e.g., provide you with technical solutions, legal information and like.
Your comment will be published in the relevant topic section by showing your username as the author. Please note that your comments are publicly accessible and will appear in search engines. Therefore, please consider carefully what you post prior to posting your comment. Further, we advise you to use an assumed name instead of your real name.
TeamViewer’s community helps us to satisfy our business purpose to assist product users with an open platform, on which issues, experiences and improvements can be shared and resolved. Your personal data is being processed so we understand what topics are most relevant to our users and for us to design our website user-friendly and interesting. TeamViewer also processes your personal data so that we are able to raise a defense in the event that a third party complains about your community comment’s content. In such case, TeamViewer needs to be able to contact you. Any comments you post may also be analyzed by TeamViewer against the community terms of use, including for the purpose of rewarding certain actions of community users.
The legal basis for such processing is the user agreement concerning the use of our community and our legitimate interest of incentivizing positive contributions to the community as well as possible legal defense, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) in connection with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
C.4. When you enter into a contractual relationship with us
When you purchase a license for one of our products on behalf of your company, or use the Free Version of our Software, we may process certain personal data in order to conclude the agreement with you. In doing so, we may process your personal details, as well as the company details and payment information. We rely on the services of certified payment providers to process your payments and may conduct sanctions or fraud checks in accordance with applicable laws as well as to protect our business interests.
During the contractual relationship we may also process your personal data (e.g., your email-address, address, which products you have purchased etc.) in order to provide you with invoices, and other relevant contractual information.
Below you will find the applicable cases, where we may process personal data in connection with you purchasing the license.
1. Processing the purchase
When you purchase the license for your company through our webshop or our sales representative, we may process your salutation, your name, your title, company name, address, contact email-address, country, payment details, as well as other order details to provide you with purchased license and conclude an agreement as requested. We will also process information to support payment processing, including a payment token, which is provided by our payment service provider as a record of the transaction. When issuing our invoice, corresponding data such as an invoice ID, price paid, currency, invoice date, and tax code (e.g., VAT ID), will be collected and processed.
During each transaction, we may exchange your name, payment token, company information, payment method, contact information, and other relevant details with respective payment providers. Depending on customer’s location, different payment provider (Adyen or PPRO) may be used; Your data may also be shared with PayPal and your respective bank in order to process the payment. These details are relevant for the transaction to be completed. We only receive encrypted payment information back for the processing of new and recurring transactions, as well as from cancellation and refunds.
Please note:
We do not process any clear payment details, such as your credit card numbers. We merely receive an encrypted piece of information in this connection. In case you do not terminate the agreement with us in accordance with termination provisions of the
EULA
, we will request a recurring payment using the initial payment token or transaction ID to be executed by the relevant payment provider (e.g., through the same credit card or SEPA payment details last used by you). We will only store your payment details for SEPA direct debit mandate, if you (or your company) give us an explicit consent to do so.
Where you have purchased a license through one of our partners (resellers or distributors), they will transfer personal data they have collected in the context of your purchase to TeamViewer. We will use this data to process your purchase and for continuously providing our services to you.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is Art. 6 para. 1 lit b) GDPR.
2. To manage and administer contractual relationship with you
Once you have purchased a license, we will create a corresponding license key and add it, together with information on your license’s start and expiry dates to your TeamViewer account, which you will be asked to create (please see our Product Privacy Policies for any data collected and processed when creating a TeamViewer account). During the term of the contractual relationship, we may process some personal data in order to respond to your requests or inquiries, e.g., updating contact information, issuing/re-issuing invoices, sending payment reminders, creating credit notes, general customer communication, onboarding documentation etc. Data collected in the course of any purchase will be stored and further processed in our customer relationship management system, which is facilitated by a third-party service provider (see Section D below). After you place a purchase order, you will receive a link to activate Customer Portal, where you will be able to create an account with your email-address related to TeamViewer admin account. The Customer Portal is provided by TeamViewer in order to simplify license and contract management for you, respectively for your company. There you will find information about the current subscriptions, invoices, payments and other information related to overall license and contract administration.
We may also, from time to time contact you via email or our in-product messaging service to inform you about, i.a., upcoming changes in our
EULA
, privacy policies, product updates, security updates. In doing so, we may process your name, email-address, product information (e.g., which TeamViewer version are you using) as well as your TeamViewer ID.
We may also analyze your usage of the Product as well as any information required to associate your usage of the Products to our license in order to verify it is consistent with the thresholds of your license. For this purpose, TeamViewer processes i.a., DeviceID, TeamViewerID, account information, email address and IP address. Please refer to the Product Privacy Notice for more information on information collected about your usage of the Products. For the management of outstanding debt and unpaid invoices, TeamViewer utilizes the services of an external debt collection agency. For these purposes, TeamViewer may transfer your name, your company name, address, outstanding debt and other relevant contractual information to a debt collection agency. We currently cooperate with Creditreform Göppingen Engelhardt KG in this connection.
The legal basis for all processing in this context is Art. 6 para. 1 lit b) GDPR.
3. Contacting you in connection with your use of Free Version of the software
If you use so-called Free Version of our software in accordance with the terms of our
EULA
for your personal and non-commercial purposes, we reserve the right to audit your use by technical means to assess whether your usage pattern is in line with the indicated usage volume and thus with the chosen license type (in this case, Free Version), and to detect whether the contractually agreed scope of use is being exceeded by you. Furthermore, we may require you, at any time, to provide a self-declaration regarding your actual scope of use and/or usage pattern.
To every extent possible, the described analyses will be based on pseudonymous data (e.g., we may consider your Device ID and data we have connected to your TeamViewer Device ID, rather than using immediately identifying personal data such as your name or email-address).
We will process your personal data in this connection in order to make sure that our software is used in accordance with the EULA provisions and to exclude its misuse, therefore, the legal basis for processing this personal data is Art. 6 para. 1 lit b) GDPR.
4. To comply with our compliance obligations
In order to abide with statutory compliance requirements, we conduct sanctions list checks for our customers, during which the following personal data may be processed: name, address, email address, phone number as well as respective tax ID. Personal data is checked against the sanctions lists provided by the German and European authorities.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is, therefore, Art. 6 para. 1 lit c) GDPR.
5. To conduct fraud and security checks
In addition to sanctions list checks, we may conduct certain anti-fraud and security checks. The purpose is to exclude fraudulent activities and to protect ourselves as well as our other customers. In doing so, the following personal data may be processed: name, company name, company address, email address, phone number, IP address, device fingerprint, purchase details.
We utilize external tools which allow detecting any fraudulent activities with help of pre-configured rules and patterns. Purchases identified and confirmed as frauds will be stored in our system to prevent future fraudulent transactions.
The purpose of this processing is to check and ensure that no business relationship is established with fraudulent actors and companies and, if necessary, to terminate such relationships in time. TeamViewer has a legitimate interest in protecting its business and, its users and customers from fraudulent activities by bad actors.
The legal basis of the processing this personal data is our legitimate interest, e.g., Art. 6, para.1 lit. f) GDPR.
C.5. When we reach out to you
We are of course interested in keeping in touch with our customers and users, as well as partners and suppliers, in order to keep you updated on relevant news, updates, contractual information, as well as to provide you with our marketing newsletters and information. In doing so, we may process your name, email-address, your TeamViewer ID and other contact information.
Below you will find detailed information on such cases, including on respective personal data processed and applicable legal basis.
1. Contacting you through Social Media Channels
We may, from time to time, contact you through various social media channels in order to inquire about your interest in our products and offerings. If you respond and /or show interest in our inquiry, we may process your name, your company information, your contact details as well as details around the service that you may be interested in.
We for example utilize the services of LinkedIn, in particular the Sales Navigator feature. For more information on LinkedIn Sales Navigator, please
refer to this link
. Information on how LinkedIn processes your personal data can be found in their
privacy policy
.
When we reach out to potential customers via multiple channels, the legal basis for doing so is our legitimate interest, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR connected later with the processing in order to enter into a contractual relationship with you, in case of your interest, hence i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
2. Contacting you regarding our Status page
If you subscribe to our
status page
, we will process your email address in order to notify you of any incidents, scheduled maintenances and operational statuses of our systems.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is your consent, e.g., Art. 6, para.1 a) GDPR which you may withdraw at any time with effect for the future.
3. Contacting you via email (newsletter) and in-product messaging
If you sign up for our newsletter (marketing, product as well as our press releases), purchase a license for one of TeamViewer products, or use our free software version as a registered user, we may process your email-address for the purpose of sending you our newsletter. This also applies, when you sign up for a free webinar, download a free whitepaper, request or extend a product trial or participate in our sweepstakes.
Through our newsletters we want to provide you with information which is most relevant and interesting for you. For this reason, we (facilitated by our data processor Inxmail GmbH) may track reactions to and interactions with emails we send you (e.g., whether you open the newsletter, click on the text and image links or display the images contained in the emails).If you sign up for our newsletter, TeamViewer processes your personal data in order to send you the newsletter. If you have thus given us your consent, the legal basis for sending the newsletter to your email-address is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR. You may withdraw such consent at any time with effect for the future. Please use the unsubscribe link provided in each of the newsletter emails or contact
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
If you have purchased a license, or use our software as a registered free user, we will subscribe you to our newsletter, which covers information about similar products to the one you purchased, on the basis of § 7 para. 3 of the German Unfair Competition Act (UWG) and Art. 6 para. 1 lit f) GDPR. In this case, you may object to receiving the newsletter at any time, and at no additional cost on our end by using the unsubscribe link provided in each of the newsletter emails or contacting
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
Tracking your and others’ reactions to and interactions with our newsletters helps us to deliver the content most useful for you, and to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of our marketing efforts. We conduct such processing to fulfill our corresponding legitimate business interest pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 lit f) GDPR.
In addition to our email communication, we may from time to time contact you through our in-product messaging services to inform you about our new offers, discounts, and additional services that may interest you.
If you are a subscription user, you can disable the in-product messaging directly within your software. Alternatively, you can contact us at
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
C.6. When we analyze personal data
In certain cases, TeamViewer may combine and analyze certain information in the course of activities described in Sections C.2 to C.5 above together with the information available to TeamViewer internally, e.g., the use of the Software, respectively which Software have been purchased, or if a user recently started a trial of one of our products (incl. the information on your use of the product during the trial). TeamViewer conducts these analyses to decide on whether, when, and how to inform or get in touch with its customers and users. In this context, the aim is to convey relevant information about our products also in the most suitable manner, which may include in-product messages, email communications or contact by phone.
TeamViewer may also use the gathered information in order to prioritize the workload internally and to set up the processes more efficiently. Also, the analyses will assist in predicting as well as retrospectively evaluating the effectiveness of marketing and sales efforts, although such analysis and reporting is mostly done on an aggregated level.
To every extent possible, the described analyses measures will be based on pseudonymous data (e.g., we may consider the Google Analytics Client ID and other non-personalized cookie data, or data we have connected to your Device ID, or usage data aggregated at the license level, rather than using immediately identifying personal data such as your name or email-address).
Furthermore, TeamViewer may analyze some personal data also in connection with the Free Version software as described in Section C.4.3.
The legal basis for processing personal data for analysis purposes are performance of or processing prior to entering into a contract (e.g., when you contact our sales team and ask for a demo), i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b), Art. 49 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR, and/or our legitimate interest (e.g., when we try to find out what information about our products you might be most interested in and whether and how to best get in touch with you), i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR as long as no consent is required. For the data processing activities that require your consent, the processing is based on Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a), Art. 49 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
In this connection, TeamViewer may combine and conduct various analyses on the following data:
the information you submit (e.g., when contacting our sales and support teams, requesting a quote or providing feedback) and, more generally, your interactions with our communication channels (e.g., metadata of phone calls, such as which personalized number you have called at what time, or email correspondence with our sales and support teams or your history of submitting tickets and how they have been handled);
information on your interactions with our products (such as product usage data, or data on the types and frequency of connections you make) as described in our Product Privacy Policies;
certain customer information, such as company name, job title, account information and purchase history (e.g., license information), as well as information whether you have started a trial, your participation in our webinars, and the like.
Based on the analysis and the results of it, TeamViewer then may:
contact you by email, beyond sending our regular newsletter (e.g., to send out promotional materials to you as our customer or to invite you to participate in customer satisfaction and other surveys as described in Section C.2.4), using the email-address you submitted; or
by phone using the phone number you submitted (e.g., during, or in due course after expiry of a product trial you requested or to follow up on feedback or inquiries you have placed with us); or
conduct targeted advertising to inform you about changes to or improvements of our products, entirely new products, or to provide you with tips on how to best use our products as well as other useful information (e.g., on discounts, freebies or give-aways); we may do so on our websites, within our products and apps, or on third-party websites and apps.
C.7. When you are our partner, reseller or distributor
If you are one of our partners, reseller, or our distributor, we may process your name, your job title, your company, as well as contact details in order to manage the contractual relationship with you, respectively your company and to provide you with the newest information and updates about our offerings. Your personal data will be processed by our respective employees (e.g., Procurement, HR, IT etc.) throughout our cooperation. In this connection, we may also process your personal data through our so-called partner portal.
Furthermore, we may process and store your personal data in connection with our partner certification programs and your registration on and your use of our Partner Portal.
We require to process your personal data in order to maintain the contractual relationship between us.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is, Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR or our legitimate interest, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
C.8. When you are our supplier
If you are one of our suppliers, we may process your name, your job title, your company, as well as contact details in order to manage the relationship with you, respectively your company. Your personal data will be processed by our respective employees (e.g., Procurement, HR, IT etc.) throughout our cooperation.
We require processing your personal data in order to maintain the contractual relationship between us.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is, therefore, Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR or our legitimate interest, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
C.9. When we receive your data from third parties
We may, from time to time, receive your personal data such as your name and your contact details from third parties, e.g., from event organizers, various trade fair organizers, partner websites, our integration partners (e.g., Salesforce, Microsoft, SAP etc.) and similar sources. The purpose of the transfer, as well as subsequent processing of personal data is, in most of the cases, marketing, and our desire to reach a wider audience with offers regarding our products and services. We always make sure that there is appropriate legal basis (e.g., your consent) in place, before even processing any personal data.
The legal basis for processing this personal data is, therefore, either, your consent, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) or the contractual relationship with you, i.e., lit. b) GDPR. You may withdraw your consent at any time with effect for the future.
D. Recipients
Our employees, who administer, maintain and further develop TeamViewer’s website, Products and Services may receive access to your personal data. To that end, TeamViewer has strong technical and organizational security measures to protect personal data against unauthorized disclosure to third parties and to ensure that only relevant individuals, who act within their job description and have a need-to-know interest in accessing any of your personal data, will have access to the data for which they have sufficient clearance.
In addition, we utilize services of external service providers (e.g., Microsoft, Amazon Web Services, Inxmail GmbH, Cloudfare etc.), as well as our affiliate network worldwide (e.g., TeamViewer entities in Greece, USA, Australia, Austria, Japan etc.).
All mentioned third-party providers and employees of such providers may receive access to personal data through the service they provide.
TeamViewer chooses all third-party service providers with due care, obligates them to confidentiality, and concludes data processing agreements with them in accordance with the standards of the GDPR, as far as necessary. Should you have any questions about third parties we use, please contact us at
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
TeamViewer will generally not transfer your personal data outside the EU and/or EEA. However, there are some exceptions to this rule, which include data transfers for group internal services provided from outside the EU, including Australia, USA and Armenia as an example.
Whenever TeamViewer transfers your personal data out of the EU or the EEA to countries that do not have an adequate level of data protection recognized by the EU, we will apply safeguards to adequately protect your personal data. In particular, we will conclude model contracts with corresponding entities in accordance with applicable laws. Please
refer to this link
to obtain further information on the Standard Contractual Clauses for the transfer of personal data to processors established outside the EU or EEA.
If you use our product, contact us through the contact, support, and feedback features, and/or if you request a quote, TeamViewer employees that are responsible for the respective service will receive access to your personal data. Aside from TeamViewer employees, your personal data may be processed by employees of third-party services providers, who assist us in handling your requests, e.g., if you use our chat functionality on the website, speak to us on the phone (e.g., external call centers), or contact us through forms on certain website landing pages (e.g., employees of the website support suppliers).
If you post a comment in TeamViewer’s community or blog, your comment content and name/username will be publicly available and may appear in search engines. Aside from TeamViewer employees, employees of the hosting company may receive access to your personal data as described in Section C.3.
If you purchase a TeamViewer Product, TeamViewer employees concerned with processing such transactions will receive access to your data. We also use the services of third-party payment token providers, such as PPRO Latin America GmbH and Adyen N.V. respectively. In addition, our fraud prevention software may also process your data on our behalf.
In connection with hosting and processing your data on your behalf, we may use certain subprocessors, e.g., Anexia Internetdienstleistungs GmbH, Amazon Web Services, Google Ireland Ltd., TeamViewer Austria GmbH, Stack IT KG, etc.
TeamViewer may transfer your personal data to third parties if we offer participation in campaigns, contests, reservations, or contract agreements in conjunction with a third party. In this case, you will be specifically informed about the transmission to the third parties.
For web analytics and (re-)marketing activities, we rely on a number of third-party providers, which will process personal data on our behalf as explained in more detail in our
Cookie Notice
.
Finally, TeamViewer uses external third-party service providers to help operate its business, such as providers of IT operation and maintenance services, (cloud) storage service providers and providers of (cloud) collaboration tools. Examples include Amazon Web Services and Microsoft (Dynamics 365, Azure).
As a global company, we may receive messages that require translation of the content of some inquiries. In such case, our employees use third-party translation tools in order to process your inquiry. Thus, you might want to avoid entering personal information into the subject line and description field of your inquiry.
E. Retention
Your personal data will be deleted once you withdraw consent, or, more generally, once the purpose for processing of your personal data has ceased to exist. The exact retention period will thus depend on the categories of personal data and the processing purposes:
Bookkeeping and accounting: In some cases, we are legally required to retain personal data for a certain period of time, e.g., for invoices, or payment details, for up to 10 years for these purposes.
Marketing: for the data which we may process for marketing purposes, the retention period will depend either on your withdrawal of your consent, or if, in case the processing is based on our legitimate interest or the performance of a contract, the achievement of the processing purposes, e.g., two years for the pseudonymized usage data, or one year for a survey results.
Protecting our legitimate interests: We may require storing personal data to protect our own legitimate interest, e.g., support ticket data or CRM data for up to 3 years (duration of statutory limitation period).
Once such period has lapsed, and there is no purpose to be fulfilled by the processing of personal data, we will delete or anonymize the data in accordance with data protection obligations.
F. Statutory/contractual requirement
You may choose not to provide your personal data or provide incomplete personal data to us. However, you should be aware that you may not be able to engage in a contractual relationship with us or receive adequate support or may not be able to use all the functionalities of our website.
G. Your rights
You may contact us either in writing or by email at
privacy@teamviewer.com
in order to exercise the following rights to the extent you are entitled to under applicable law:
You have the right to request information about the processing of your personal data in accordance with Art. 13 and 14 GDPR (Right to Information);
You may request access to your personal data as well as request a copy of your personal data (Right of Access, Art. 15 GDPR);
You may request that we supplement, correct or delete your personal data (Right to Rectification, Art. 16 GDPR and Right to Erasure, Art. 17 GDPR); the right of rectification also comprises the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement;
You may request that we restrict the processing of your personal data (Right to Restriction of Processing, Art. 18 GDPR);
You may request to receive your personal data, which you provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and transmit it without hindrance or have it transmitted to another controller (Right to Data Portability, Art. 20 GDPR);
You may object, at any time, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the processing of your personal data which is based on the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. The processing of your personal data will then be cancelled, unless we demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights, and freedoms or the processing is necessary for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims (Right to Object, Art. 21 GDPR);
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority in relation to the processing of your personal data.
You have the right to opt out at any time from every processing activity which is based on your consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR. Your opt out does not affect the lawfulness of the processing in the past.
The relevant supervisory authority for TeamViewer is
Der Landesbeauftragte für den Datenschutz und die Informationsfreiheit, Lautenschlagerstraße 20, 70173 Stuttgart, Germany
.
Should you have any questions on the processing of your personal data by TeamViewer Germany GmbH in relation to your contractual relationship, please contact
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
H. Compliance with the CCPA
Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”), you will not receive discriminatory treatment for exercising your privacy rights. You may also designate an authorized agent to make a privacy request on your behalf. Please refer to the Section titled
Information for California Consumers: Your California Privacy Rights
under the TeamViewer US Privacy Policy at
https://www.teamviewer.com/en-us/legal/privacy-and-cookies/#us-website
.
I. Compliance with Brazilian LGPD
TeamViewer has checked the compliance topic with the Brazilian Data Protection Law Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (Law No. 13,709/2018) (“
LGPD
“) to ensure that our measures and procedures under the GDPR cover the topics within the LGPD. The privacy notice under the LGPD is available for Brazilian visitors and users under www.teamviewer.com/en-us/privacy-notice.
J. Changes to this Privacy Notice
TeamViewer may, from time to time, make amendments to this Privacy Notice to reflect the changes in our processing activities.
TeamViewer US Website Privacy Policy
Version as of March 2024
YOUR PRIVACY: OVERVIEW
If you are a located in North or South America, this privacy policy (“
Privacy Policy
“) explains how TeamViewer US, Inc. (collectively, “
TeamViewer
,” “
we
,” or “
us
“) collects, uses, discloses, and retains your personal data when you access or use our website. If you are located in India, then “TeamViewer,” “we,” and “us” refers to both TeamViewer US, Inc. and TeamViewer India Private Ltd., 5th floor, Spectrum Tower, Mindspace, Chincholi Bunder Road, Malad (West) Mumbai, MH, 400064. If you are located in Australia or New Zealand, then then “TeamViewer,” “we,” and “us” refers to both TeamViewer US, Inc. and TeamViewer Pty, Ltd., 118 Greenhill Road, SA 5061 Unley, Adelaide, Australia. Please review this Privacy Policy carefully.
Please note that the TeamViewer Group may provide different or additional privacy notices in connection with certain activities, products, services, and offerings. For more information about our privacy practices concerning our products, services, and other jurisdictions, please refer to the privacy policies posted on ours or the applicable TeamViewer Group website.
REVISIONS TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
TeamViewer reserves the right to change this Privacy Policy from time to time. If we make changes, we will revise the date at the top of this Privacy Policy. If we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we may also choose to provide you with additional notice (such as adding a statement to our websites’ homepages or sending you a notification).
Content
COLLECTION OF PERSONAL DATA
USE OF PERSONAL DATA
DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL DATA
ADVERTISING AND ANALYTICS SERVICES PROVIDED BY OTHERS
DATA RETENTION
CHILDREN’S POLICY
THIRD PARTY SITES
SECURITY PRACTICES
YOUR RIGHTS
INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA CONSUMERS: YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
CONTACT US
IMPRINT
TEAMVIEWER GROUP PRIVACY POLICY
COLLECTION OF PERSONAL DATA
In this Privacy Policy, “personal data” means any information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with or reasonably can be used to identify an individual or household and other data that is linked to personal data. The types of personal data we collect about you depend on your interactions with us and are described in more detail below.
PERSONAL DATA YOU PROVIDE DIRECTLY TO US THROUGH THE USE OF THE WEBSITE
We collect personal data directly from you in a variety of ways, including when you:
Fill out lead forms;
Request additional information about our products or services or sign up to receive our e-mail newsletters or marketing messages;
Interact with us on social media;
Participate in or respond to surveys or requests for opinions, feedback and preferences;
Contact us through an online contact form, chat function on our website, or via phone;
Subscribe and/or post to our blog;
Provide feedback or make other submissions to us; and
Participate in a survey performed by or on behalf of TeamViewer.
The types of data we collect directly from you may include: your first name, last name, e-mail address, address, telephone number, country, job title, phone number, username, company information (including company size), demographic information, personal preferences, reactions to and interactions with our communication channels, account information, purchase history, and any other personal data that you choose to include in your submissions or communications with us.
PERSONAL DATA AND DATA WE COLLECT AUTOMATICALLY
We automatically collect personal data when you access and use our website. The types of information we collect may include:
Networking and device information, such as your browser type, IP address, and operating system version, language settings;
Information about your website activities, such your access times, pages viewed, the routes by which you came to our website, your use of any hyperlinks available within our services; and
Information collected via cookies, web beacons, and other tracking technologies, including Internet service provider (ISP), Mobile Advertising ID, media access control (MAC) address, or identifiers associated with browser cookies, web beacons and similar technologies we deploy on our services.
PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT FROM OTHER SOURCES
We may collect personal data about you from other sources. For example, we may collect personal data about you from:
Third parties hosting events, including those sponsored by TeamViewer, when they share event attendance or participation information with us;
Third-party social media and communication services, such as Facebook, Twitter, Google, LinkedIn, and Instagram, that you use to interact with our services (e.g., to create an account) or that allow you to share information (e.g., via plugins, widgets or other tools), but always in accordance with the authorization procedures and privacy settings you establish with such services; and
Unaffiliated parties, such as service providers that we use, analytics companies, advertising networks, consumer data resellers, and other third parties that provide us with information, so we can better understand you and provide you with information and offers that may be of interest to you.
PERSONAL DATA WE DERIVE
We may derive information or draw inferences about you based on the other types of personal data we collect. For example, we may infer your location based on your IP address.
USE OF PERSONAL DATA
We collect and use personal data for business and commercial purposes, including to:
Develop, provide and improve our events and websites;
Respond to your requests and any other communications from you;
Send advertising or marketing communications about products, services, offers, promotions, rewards and events offered by TeamViewer and others, and provide news and information that we believe may be of interest to you;
Offer and administer events, contests, and other promotions;
Conduct internal research and development;
Comply with our legal obligations; and
Debug, identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality of our website.
DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL DATA
We share personal data for the purposes described below:
a.
With our Affiliates and Subsidiaries
. Disclosures of your personal data to the TeamViewer Group, including our parent entities, subsidiaries and affiliates (as the case may be), for the purposes described in the “USE OF PERSONAL DATA” section above. Specifically, if and when you become a TeamViewer customer we may share information such as your name, email address, address, telephone number, country, job title, username, company information (including company size), demographic information, personal preferences, reactions to and interactions with our communication channels, account information, purchase history, chosen payment method, information to support payment processing (including a payment token), invoice ID, price paid, currency, invoice date, tax code, license key, license start and expiry dates, and any other information collected through our websites or that you choose to include in your profile or in other communications with us. Since our parent company, subsidiaries and affiliates are located around the world, please note that these disclosures involve international transfers of your personal data.
b.
With our Service Providers
. We share personal data with unaffiliated companies or individuals we hire or work with that perform services on our behalf, including customer support, web hosting, information technology, payment processing, product fulfilment, fraud control, direct mail and email distribution, events, contests, sweepstakes and promotion administration, and analytics services. We only share with service providers the personal data that they need to perform services for us. Since our service providers are located around the world, please note that these disclosures involve international transfers of your personal data.
c.
With our Professional Advisors
. We share personal data with our legal, financial, and other advisors in connection with the management of all or part of TeamViewer’s business or operations.
d.
With Law Enforcement Authorities and Individuals Involved in Legal Proceedings
. We disclose personal data when we believe doing so is reasonably necessary to comply with applicable law or legal process (including an enforceable request from authorities), to respond to claims (including inquiries by you in connection with your purchases from TeamViewer), or to protect the rights, property or personal safety of TeamViewer, our users, employees or the public.
e.
With Your Consent or at Your Direction
. We share personal data with third parties when we have your consent to do so. For example, if you decide to participate in certain interactive areas or features of our events or services, you consent to the disclosure of this information to other users of our websites. We may also share your personal data with third parties when you intentionally direct us to do so or when you use our services to intentionally interact with third parties.
We may also share aggregated or de-identified information, which cannot reasonably be used to identify you.
ADVERTISING AND ANALYTICS SERVICES PROVIDED BY OTHERS
We may allow others to provide analytics services and serve advertisements on our behalf across the web and in mobile applications. These entities may use cookies, web beacons, device identifiers, and other tracking technologies which collect information about your use of our services and other websites and applications. This information may be used by TeamViewer and others to, among other things, analyze and track data, determine the popularity of certain content, deliver advertising and content targeted to your interest on our services and other websites, and better understand your online activity.
Such tools include:
1. Google Analytics and Other Analysis Tools Provided by Google
TeamViewer uses Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, or any other Affiliate of Google LLC (“
Google
“). Google Analytics uses “cookies”, i.e. text files that are stored on your computer and enable analysis of your use of our website. When you visit our website for the first time, you will be assigned a cookie with a unique user identification, i.e. a
Google Analytics Client ID
. We may replace this Google Analytics Client ID with your TeamViewer Device ID if you use one of our products (please refer to our
Product Privacy Policy
for details). We will add the respective data point to the data available in the Google Analytics tools, and this way we use Google Analytics also for cross-device analyses of user streams.
Other tools we use in this context that are also provided by Google include:
Google Tag Manager
(a tag management system that allows TeamViewer to quickly and easily update tracking codes and related code fragments collectively known as “tags” on our website or mobile app);
Google Big Query
(an enterprise data warehouse that enables SQL queries using the processing power of Google’s infrastructure; TeamViewer uses Big Query to store and query data sets which are collected by Google services such as Google Analytics, and the Big Query data is used to build flexible reports for evaluating our website performance);
Google Display Network
(used to measure the impact of unclicked Google Display Network ad impressions on the website, behavior of users, and conversions; please refer to
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/3105620
for further information); and
Google Optimize
(for A/B testing, offering to analyze user behavior by showing slightly varied website contents to different user groups, depending on profile matching; thereby, TeamViewer analyzes its online services, improves its web offerings, and can create an interesting user journey).
TeamViewer Group uses data gathered through your Google Analytics Client ID as well as other data generated from Google’s web analytics applications in order to perform analyses of your interactions with our products, services, and websites. With the help of Google’s Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting, we will receive analyses on our users’ age, gender, and interest categories (please refer to
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/2799357?hl=en
for further information). We strive to offer you tailored products and services that are best suited for your individual circumstances. To that end, Google provides us with insights and statistics that help us to make our online presence, our communications to you, and ultimately our products more interesting and relevant for you.
As further explained in our
Cookies Policy
, you may block cookies from being stored on your device, and consequently prevent the described analyses from being conducted, by adjusting the settings in your browser software; however, in such case, you may not be able to use all of the features and functionalities of our website. You can also block the collection of the data generated by the cookie and the data related to your use of the website (incl. your IP address) as well as the processing of this data by Google, by downloading and installing a browser plugin available from the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en
.
Please visit the website
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en
for an overview on Google’s approach on data protection for Google Analytics as well as their privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
.
2. Demandbase
TeamViewer uses web analytics services provided by Demandbase Inc., located at 680 Folsom Street, Suite 400 San Francisco, CA 94107 USA. Demandbase utilizes tracking technology, which includes the storing and accessing of cookies, to collect data about website visitors. Demandbase’s Tags, or JavaScript, pixels, cookies or other similar technology or code, cause a unique cookie ID to be associated with each visitor who accesses our website and may sync with third-party cookies. Demandbase’s Tags on our website may collect data on device information (such as a website visitor’s IP address), cookies, or other technical information (such as web browser type, operating system or timestamp).
The Demandbase Tags are used for analytics and advertising services provided by Demandbase. They are also used for performance and optimization of Demandbase data and reporting. Demandbase’s services help us tailor our communications and improve the quality of the content we provide to our prospects, users, and customers. It also helps to improve our website user experience and performance by personalizing and optimizing the website for visitors.
For further information on Demandbase’s privacy approach, visit
https://www.demandbase.com/privacy-policy/
. For more details on the cookies used by Demandbase, visit
https://www.demandbase.com/cookies/
.
3. Google AdWords Conversion and Google Remarketing
TeamViewer’s website uses Google AdWords in order to generate attention for our products and services by conducting targeted advertising campaigns on third-party websites and apps. Data generated by such campaigns helps us to determine the success rate of individual campaigns. TeamViewer aims at providing you with advertisement that is of interest to you, to make its website more interesting, and calculate advertising expenses accurately.
Such means of advertisement are delivered by Google through a so-called Ad Server. Along with this, TeamViewer uses
Ad Server Cookies
, which scale certain parameters, such as display of ads or clicks by users. When you click on an ad delivered by Google that redirects you to our website, a cookie is stored on your computer by Google AdWords. These cookies usually expire within 30 days and are not supposed to be used to personally identify a user. In addition to these cookies, analytic values like a
unique cookie ID, quantity of Ad impressions per storing, last impression and opt-out information
(markings that the user does not want to be addressed any further) are usually stored. These cookies enable Google to recognize your internet browser.
If you visit certain pages on our website and provided the cookie stored on your computer has not yet expired, TeamViewer and Google are able to recognize that you clicked on an ad and were redirected to the TeamViewer website. Every Google AdWords customer receives a different cookie. Therefore, cookies cannot be tracked across different sites by TeamViewer, as is the case for all other AdWords customers. TeamViewer merely receives statistical evaluations from Google. By and through these statistical evaluations, we can evaluate which advertisement campaign was particularly effective. Any additional data generated by the particular advertisement is not forwarded to TeamViewer; particularly, we cannot personally identify users through this information.
Through this (re-)marketing tool, your browser automatically connects to Google’s servers. Please note that scope and further use of the data processed by Google are subject to Google’s privacy policy and beyond TeamViewer’s control. We thus inform you based on our own knowledge: By integrating AdWords, Google receives information that you visited a particular TeamViewer website or part thereof, and/or that you clicked on one of our advertisements. If you are registered with one of Google’s services, Google is able to match your visit to your Google account. Google may receive your IP address and/or may store it even if you are not registered with one of Google’s services and/or if you have not been logged in. You may avoid tracking in various ways, e.g. through:
a setting of your browser software, particularly, by suppressing third party cookie installation in order to prevent receiving third-party ads;
deactivating AdWords Cookies, by setting your browser so that cookies from www.googleadservices.com are being blocked; this can be done at
https://adssettings.google.com/anonymous
, however, such settings are deleted if you delete cookies; or
permanently deactivating cookies in your browser under
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/7395996
.
Further information on Google’s approach to data privacy can be found under
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
. Alternatively, you can disable the use of cookies for interest-based advertising via the advertising network initiative, by following the instructions at
https://optout.networkadvertising.org/?c=1#!%2F
.
In addition to Google AdWords, TeamViewer uses the tool “
Google Remarketing
.” This is an application that allows us to address you again, even when you have left our website. After visiting our website and while you are surfing the internet, our advertisement can be displayed to you by and through this application. This is enabled by cookies stored on your device, which track and analyze user behavior on different websites for Google. Google can track your previous visits to our website.
According to its own statement, Google does not combine data gathered through Remarketing with any personal data Google may have stored about you. Furthermore, the data processed for these purposes is generally limited to pseudonymous information. If you do not want to be exposed to data processing through the Google Remarketing feature, you can disable it by changing the appropriate settings at
https://adssettings.google.com/anonymous
.
4. Social Media Tracking Tools, including “Tracking Pixels”
We also use other tools on our website allowing us to offer you a more personalized and engaged web experience by offering you advertisements on your social media channels that are more relevant to you. To that end, we use cookie-based (please refer again to our
Cookies Policy
) tools offered by the following third-party social media providers:
Facebook Inc.
, 1601 S California Ave, Palo Alto, California 94304, USA; for further information on the implemented tool, please refer to
https://developers.facebook.com/docs/facebook-pixel/implementation#base-code
; for additional information on data collection, refer to
https://www.facebook.com/help/186325668085084
.
LinkedIn Corporation
, 2029 Stierlin Court, Mountain View, California 94043, USA; for further information on the implemented tool and how to opt out of corresponding tracking, please refer to
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
; for further information on LinkedIn’s approach to privacy refer to:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy?trk=uno-reg-guest-home-privacy-policy
.
Twitter Inc.
, 1355 Market St, Suite 900, San Francisco, California 94103, USA; for further information on the implemented tool and how to opt out of corresponding tracking, please refer to
https://help.twitter.com/en/safety-and-security/privacy-controls-for-tailored-ads
; for further information on Twitter’s approach to privacy refer to:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
.
In each case, we integrate snippets of code provided by these social media operators that load a small library of functions (sometimes referred to as “tracking pixels”, i.e. transparent, pixel-sized images embedded in websites with a tracking functionality). These functions enable us to track your activities on our website, such as URLs visited, domains visited, device(s) used, and, in particular advertising conversions (i.e. actions counted when you interact with one of our ads, such as clicking it and purchasing our product afterwards). They rely on cookies placed by the mentioned third-party providers, which may also enable us to match our website visitors to respective user accounts on the respective social media platforms.
We may also use the “
Custom Audience
” service provided by Facebook Inc., for delivering targeted advertising to you. In this context, we would check whether you hold an account with Facebook for which you use the same email-address that you have provided to us and include you in a corresponding “custom audience” group. This works by us providing your email-address to Facebook Inc. in a hashed format, and this way making sure that Facebook will only process, as a data processor on our behalf, actual email-addresses of users that have already subscribed to their service (please refer to
https://www.facebook.com/business/help/112061095610075?id=2469097953376494&helpref=faq_content
for further information on this process). You may opt-out of receiving targeted ads because you are part of a custom audience created by TeamViewer through clicking a corresponding link when you select the “Why am I seeing this?” feature on the Facebook platform (see
https://www.facebook.com/help/562973647153813?helpref=about_content
).
Like many websites, TeamViewer uses “cookies” to analyze visits to our website and help us improve our website and services. Most web browsers are set to accept cookies by default. If you prefer, you can usually set your browser to remove or reject cookies. Please follow your browser’s process for doing so. Please note that if you choose to remove or reject cookies, this could affect the availability and functionality of our websites. For detailed information on the cookies we use and the purpose for which we use them, see our
Cookies Policy
.
RETENTION OF PERSONAL DATA
Your personal data will be deleted once you withdraw consent, or, more generally, once the purpose for processing has ceased to exist. In some cases, TeamViewer is legally obligated to retain data for a certain period. Once this period has lapsed, TeamViewer will delete the data in accordance with data protection obligations.
CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
TeamViewer’s services are not intended for children under the age of 18. TeamViewer does not target our services to children under 18.
THIRD PARTY SITES
Please note that our websites contain links to third-party websites that are not controlled or operated by TeamViewer. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that TeamViewer does not accept any responsibility or liability for these policies. Please review these policies before you disclose any personal data when visiting such third-party websites.
SECURITY PRACTICES
We take the safety of your personal data and its confidentiality very seriously and we provide reasonable security safeguards commensurate to the sensitivity of the personal data being handled and have implemented security practices including but not limited to technical, operational, and physical safeguards to protect your information. We implement a variety of security measures when entering, submitting, or accessing information to maintain the safety of your personal data. The website is scanned on a regular basis for any known vulnerabilities in order to make your use as safe as possible.
Your personal data is contained behind secured networks and it only accessible by a limited number of persons who have special access rights to such systems or otherwise require personal data for appropriate purposes. These persons are also under an obligation to keep such personal data confidential. All of the data centers TeamViewer uses have achieved ISO/IEC 27001 certification, which is the international standard for information security management systems and security controls. The data centers have implemented state-of-the-art security controls, which means that personal access control, video camera surveillance, motion detectors, 24×7 monitoring, and on-site security personnel ensure access to the data center is only granted to authorized persons and guarantee the best possible security for hardware and data. There is also a detailed identification check at the single point-of-entry to the data center.
Please be aware that, although we endeavor to provide reasonable security for your personal data, no security system can prevent all potential security breaches.
We endeavor to ensure that all third-party service providers whose services which we may use, maintain security standards that are equivalent to our security standards and commensurate with market practices, in the context of the kind and nature of personal data being stored or handled.
For more information, you may visit the
TeamViewer Trust Center
or request for a copy of our Security Measures.
YOUR RIGHTS
You may contact us in order to exercise the following rights to the extent you are entitled to so under applicable law:
You may access your personal data to check and review such data;
You may request a copy of your personal data;
You may demand that we supplement, correct or delete your personal data; or cease or restrict the collection, processing, use or disclosure of your personal data; and
You may withdraw consent and/or object to the processing of your personal data; and
You may request to receive your personal data in a portable and (if technically feasible) readily usable format.
To submit such a request, please contact us under
privacy@teamviewer.com
, at 1-800-638-0253, or
submit a ticket
on our website. Your request will be promptly attended to by a member of our team. TeamViewer may request your name, email address, and/or account information in order to verify your request.
Should you have any questions, please contact
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
This Privacy Policy contains links to sites and information that are not under TeamViewer’s direct control. These links are therefore subject to change and TeamViewer will review and update this Privacy Policy periodically to reflect such changes.
INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA CONSUMERS: YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES RELATED TO COLLECTION, USE AND DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL DATA
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”) allows California residents, upon a verifiable consumer request and subject to applicable exemptions, to request that we give you access, in a portable and (if technically feasible) readily usable form, to the specific pieces and categories of personal information that we have collected about you, the categories of sources for that information, the business or commercial purposes for collecting the information, and the categories of third parties with which the information was shared. California residents also have the right to submit a request for deletion of information under certain circumstances.
Consistent with California law, TeamViewer will not discriminate against those who exercise their rights. Specifically, if you exercise your rights, we will not deny you services, charge you different prices for services or provide you a different level or quality of services.
To submit a data request, please contact us under
privacy@teamviewer.com
, at 1-800-638-0253, or
submit a ticket
on our website. Please note that you must verify your identity and request before further action is taken. Consistent with California law, you may designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf. In order to designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf, you may have to provide a valid power of attorney, the requester’s valid government issued identification, and the authorized agent’s valid government issued identification.
We collect personal data from you and the sources described in the “
PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT FROM OTHER SOURCES
” subsection of this Privacy Policy.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have collected the following categories of personal data: identifiers, characteristics of protected classifications under California or U.S. law, commercial information, internet and electronic network activity, geolocation data, audio and visual information, inferences drawn about your preferences, and other categories of personal data that relates to or is reasonably capable of being associated with you. For examples of the precise data points we collect, see the section titled “
COLLECTION OF PERSONAL DATA
” in this Privacy Policy.
We do not sell personal information to third parties, as that is defined under the CCPA.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have shared personal information with third parties for business purposes as further detailed in this Privacy Policy. We may share your personal data with third parties as described in the “
DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL DATA
” section of this Privacy Policy.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed the following categories of personal data for business or commercial purposes: identifiers, internet and electronic network activity information, commercial information, audio and visual information, geolocation data, demographic information, inferred information, and other information that we have derived or inferred about you or that relates to or is reasonably capable of being associated with you. For information on the business or commercial purpose for using the personal data, see the section of this Privacy Policy titled “
USE OF PERSONAL DATA
.”
CONTACT US
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy, you may contact us at 1-800-638-0253 or
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
IMPRINT
TeamViewer US, Inc.
5741 Rio Vista Drive
Clearwater, FL 33760
USA
TEAMVIEWER GROUP PROCESSING
We share also collect, use, and share data and personal data with other entities within the TeamViewer Group as it relates to a number of functions and activities related to the TeamViewer products, which are developed by, maintained, and contracted with our parent company, TeamViewer Germany GmbH. Examples of this include, but are not limited to, purchasing a product or service, concluding a purchase transaction, product trials, customer support, participation in customer online forums, and other customer-related activities. For more information for how we process this data and personal data, please visit our
TeamViewer Group Privacy Policy
.
Privacy Notice for TeamViewer Products
Version as of 17 March 2025
TeamViewer Germany GmbH and its affiliates (“
TeamViewer
”) take protection of your personal data very seriously. Personal data means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person, such as name, address, email-addresses, IP address, or user behavior etc. The following document (
Privacy Notice
) provides you with information about the processing of personal data in relation to your use of our Software and Services as described and defined in the
End User License Agreement
(
EULA
) in connection with the use of our Software and Services (hereinafter,
Products
,
TeamViewer Product
or
TeamViewer Products
).
Depending on the processing activity and its purpose, TeamViewer may act as either (i) a controller as defined by the General Data Protection Regulation (
GDPR
), or (ii) as a processor for our customers as defined in more detail in our
EULA
and our
Data Processing Agreement
(
DPA
). If your personal data has been submitted to us by or on behalf of one of our customers, please see the privacy policy of the applicable customer. If you wish to exercise any rights you may have under applicable data protection laws, please reach out to the company providing you with our Products directly.
Subsequently, TeamViewer may process the various personal data for various purposes and in a different capacity.
On a case-by-case basis, TeamViewer may act in a different capacity in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. Concrete examples of which personal data we process in which capacity are as follows:
Personal data in connection with our agreement with you, e.g., your contact information. More information on this and how we process personal data as controllers for maintaining our contractual relationship with our users and customers can be found in our
General Privacy Notice
.
Personal data in connection with yourTeamViewer Account (e.g., your email, password, username etc.), as well as with various TeamViewer Features, esp. initiating connections, hosting of your contact lists, or managing a team of people using our Product under your license. In this context TeamViewer may act as processors as defined under Art. 4 no. 8 GDPR. More on processing in this context can be found in our
DPA
, respectively in its
Annexes
.
Personal data derived from your use of our Products and Services, e.g., your feedback, as well as statistical and analytical data for marketing and product development purposes. In this case TeamViewer may act as controller of such data. This Privacy Notice serves the purpose to provide more information in this context.
Below you will find more information on when, how, and why we process your personal data in connection with your use of our Products.
A. Controller
Your contracting TeamViewer entity as set out at
https://www.teamviewer.com/en/legal/contracting-entities/
is controller pursuant to Art. 4 para. 7 General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) concerning any processing of personal data for which we determine the purpose and means of processing.
B. Data Protection Officer (DPO)
TeamViewer appointed an external data protection officer (DPO). In addition, TeamViewer established a dedicated Privacy team, which closely collaborates with the DPO. The Privacy team as well as the DPO can be reached at
privacy@teamviewer.com
or at TeamViewer Germany GmbH, for the confidential attention of the DPO, Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany.
C. Categories of personal data, purposes, and legal basis for the processing
C.1. When you use TeamViewer Products
C.1.1. Getting started
When you install the Software and use the Product for the first time on a new device, we need to collect certain information from that device, such as your IP address, device’s MAC address, operating system (
OS
) specific identifier combined with other device-related information to ensure its uniqueness. From this information, TeamViewer creates a unique Machine ID (
MID
), from which the TeamViewer master infrastructure generates the TeamViewer Device ID (
TeamViewer ID
), which in turn allows it to distinguish between unique user devices that have the Software installed.
When you sign up for an account in a TeamViewer Product (hereafter
TeamViewer Account
), TeamViewer collects your name, email-address, a password of your choice, along with time, date, and time zone of you signing in and creates a unique identifier (e.g. TeamViewer Account ID) for your TeamViewer account.
Should you choose to add the additional security option of two factor authentication to your account, TeamViewer will process the data required to provide this option and to maintain your accounts security including: Number of login attempts, location and whether the session is active, Mobile phone number, TeamViewer ID.
TeamViewer requires the Edge WebView2 Runtime by Microsoft Ireland Operations Ltd. (One Microsoft Place, South County Business Park, Leopardstown, Dublin 18, Ireland) (
Microsoft
) for the user interface. If not already installed, it will be downloaded and installed when you click ‘Accept – next’. The Edge WebView2 Runtime may collect information and send it to Microsoft to provide services as described in Microsoft’s Privacy Statement at
https://aka.ms/privacy
.
During the installation, we will also ask you whether (i) you would like to explore the full-featured business trial, (ii) if you wish to only use the Product for personal use, or, (iii) if you already have a license. According to your choice, you may be directed to our license trial page, or you may continue with software installation process. During so, if you decide to sign up for a TeamViewer Account, we will collect your name, email-address, a password of your choice, along with time, date, and time zone of you signing in and create a unique TeamViewer Account ID for your TeamViewer Account.
In some countries we may ask our users to provide their phone numbers for identification purposes. This may be done for the purposes of strengthening our security and ensuring proper authentication.
Furthermore, TeamViewer may process your personal data for the purposes of license management. When a customer activates the license with help of the license sync option, TeamViewer license server checks the information to assign the license to the correct customer. In doing so, some personal data may be processed, such as license information (e.g., license ID, roles and permissions, type), system information (e.g., license key, server configuration), user information (e.g., email-address, IP address, status, language, organization) or session information (ID, security tokens, IP address, username device, etc.).
TeamViewer is processing personal data in connection with license management in order to assign you the required license, and, consequently, for the performance of the contract with you.
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.2. Social Login Services
You also have the option to create or log in into a TeamViewer account via an identity provider, e.g., Microsoft, Google Ireland Ltd. (Gorden House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland, etc.) (
Google
). This makes it easier for you to register for our Products. Through this, we offer you the possibility to register or log in into a TeamViewer account via an identity provider to use our Products.
If you use an identity provider, you will be forwarded to the identity provider’s page. There you can create an account or log in with an already existing account via your user data. The identity provider will ask for your consent to release certain information about your account to us. This data is collected by the identity provider and transmitted to us by the identity provider in compliance with the relevant provisions of the privacy notice. TeamViewer receives an identification token from the identity provider that contains information used to create, or connect to, your account (username and email-address). TeamViewer will process the email-address and username received from this identity provider for registration and log in to your account. To carry out this authentication process, your IP address is transmitted to the respective identity provider. We have no influence on the purpose and scope of the data collection and on the further processing of the data by the identity provider. Please note that in this context data might be processed outside of the European Union by the identity provider. For more information, please read the privacy policy of the respective provider. By using the log in via an identity provider, you agree to this data transfer to us. TeamViewer will also directly collect from you some of the information needed for providing the account (as described above, C.1.1.). You can prevent the processing of your data by the respective identity provider by not using the identity provider but using our own registration form and signing up for a TeamViewer account.
The legal basis for the processing of your personal data in connection with an identity provider is your consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
C.1.3. Conducting remote connections
Whenever you run the TeamViewer Software client, the TeamViewer master server infrastructure will register whether the device is available for a connection session with other devices. To achieve that, it collects and processes your IP address, your location, TeamViewer ID, the MID, and your chosen user screen name. While trying to connect to another device, this data is exchanged between the TeamViewer master server infrastructure, selected TeamViewer routers, and the Software client of your envisaged connection partner. In addition, our servers will automatically collect certain remote connection metadata (so called logs, which can later be used to address and analyze technical bugs and difficulties).
The decision on which connection paths are used, in particular which routing servers, depends on the analysis of this data, considering e.g., geography and current workload on individual routers. Once you successfully connect to another device and thus establish a remote control or other session with your connection partner, certain session metadata such as a remote connection (session) ID will be collected and processed.
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.4. Using Text recognition feature (Frontline and Assist AR)
Functionalities of Frontline and Assist AR include, amongst others, a text recognition feature. It is based on the use of a text recognition API provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, United States (
Google LLC
), that also enables the activation of the Optical Character Recognition (
OCR
) functionality on smart glasses used with Frontline and Assist AR. If technically possible, the API contacts Google LLC's servers from time to time in order to receive things like bug fixes, updated models and hardware accelerator compatibility information. It may also send telemetry data about the performance and utilization of the API in the Assist AR App to Google LLC. Such data include device information, application information, device or other identifiers, performance metrics, API configuration, event type and error codes (you can find further information here). Google LLC uses this data to measure performance, debug, maintain and improve the API, and detect misuse or abuse, as further described in Google’s Privacy Policy.
The legal basis to process this personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.5. Adding devices to your account
When you add so called managed devices to your TeamViewer account, we activate these devices as endpoints that are assigned to your license. To achieve that, TeamViewer collects, and processes certain data associated with those managed devices, e.g., screen name, TeamViewer ID, MID, email-address, TeamViewer Account ID, TeamViewer License ID and, if mobile device management is purchased: location data, and mobile device data. During the activation of an endpoint TeamViewer needs to ensure that the Product is used in accordance with the EULA and Product Specifications.
This is done to assign and enforce the license limits as agreed with you under your contract.
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.6. Using the Backup feature
If you choose to use our optional feature Backup, we may process the information on your purchased storage limits in order to assign you the relevant storage space and, in case the limit is reached, inform you of the storage limitation. Furthermore, we may process the information on your location, since your location is the determining factor when deciding the storage location for your personal data (e.g., if you are located within the European Union, you will be assigned the cloud in Europe).
We process certain information in order to manage your account and provide you Backup services under the contractual agreement with you.
The legal basis to process this personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.7. Using add-ons
If you use add-ons (e.g., the security services provided by Malwarebytes Inc., the mobile device management provided by Ivanti UK Ltd. or the asset management and discovery provided by Lansweeper NV) we may process certain license information, your name, email address username, IP address, your device information and similar in order to activate your license and respectively link it to your TeamViewer Account.
The legal basis to process this personal data described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.8. Product improvement and technical support
TeamViewer may process personal data to analyze server and device logs in order to identify vulnerabilities, crashes as well as other issues to consequently mitigate or fix them. During such analysis certain information that may include personal data is analyzed, such as the user information (e.g., email, IP address, status, language, organization), session ID, TeamViewer ID, call or workflow data, license data, call ID, workflow information (ID, title, etc.), multimedia assets (e.g., type of the asset, ID, name etc.), information related to certain task (ID; name, comment, creation date etc.), picking information (order ID, shelf location, status etc.), or information related to a device (memory usage, CPU usage, status of processes and services, user interactions, etc.). We are processing your personal data in connection with product improvement activities in order to provide you with better and improved services, and, consequently, for the enhancement of the contract with you.
Please note that TeamViewer has put additional technical and organizational measures in place, e.g., pseudonymization as well as further strong technical and organizational measures to ensure security of the data. It is also important to note that unless explicitly stated otherwise (e.g. Session Insights feature), we never access any content or connection data itself, but rather observe your interactions with our Software and Services.
For product improvement purposes, the overall usage patterns of TeamViewer Products are analyzed, e.g., information about how certain features of the Product, DEX services and the Server Services are used, as well as the interactions. This may include the session metadata, feature usage (e.g., remote control, file transfer, settings, etc.), and how frequently they are being used. This information helps improve and further develop TeamViewer Products, e.g., to help decide whether certain functionalities of the Product shall be kept, amended, or improved, or whether to create new features or improve the design. Please note, that TeamViewer only assesses the interactions and at no point information or data that is being exchanged between you and your connection partner(s), unless explicitly stated otherwise (e.g. Session Insights feature).
TeamViewer may analyze this data together with further information submitted to us, as further described under this Product Privacy Notice, as well as in our
General Privacy Notice
.
The legal basis to process this personal data described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.9. Analyzing and fixing crashes in applications
TeamViewer may process your personal data to analyze crashes in mobile, desktop, or web applications. This is done only if the customer enables the automatic log of crashes. In such case, all crash logs are sent to TeamViewer server where they are analyzed, and bug fixes are implemented. Such crash logs may contain information on relevant sessions (ID, security tokens, IP address, username device, etc.), as well as device information (ID, device name, IP address, application version, device logs) or user information (e.g., email, IP address, status, language, organization).
Depending on the operating system (OS) and Product, crash logs can be anonymized before collection and automatically sent out to TeamViewer.
The legal basis to process this personal data described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.1.10. Using our AI Services
If you choose to use TeamViewer’s AI Services, you or your company’s administrator need to activate them. In this case, we may process your activation to the services. We deployed AI features within the AI Services from third parties to provide a better experience, and use of these features may involve us processing any personal data submitted to them. We recommend that users do not submit sensitive or confidential information.
The legal basis of this processing is fulfillment of the terms and conditions for the AI Services, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
We may use the data collected from your input, usage, interactions, outputs and feedback of the AI Services for product improvement purposes, including the enhancement of existing and development of new features, functionalities and products. This purpose does not comprise processing of personal data. We therefore de-identify session data by removing personal data on behalf of the customer as far as possible to prevent that personal data is processed by us. However, it cannot be excluded that after the de-identification there may still be some personal data left. TeamViewer has put additional technical and organizational measures in place, e.g., pseudonymization as well as further strong encryption measures to ensure the security of the data so that only a randomized ID will be processed by us for technical reasons. This way we ensure that the session data is de-identified and that there is no longer a connection to the session participants.
Legal basis of this processing described in this section is our legitimate interest as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR. Processing is in the legitimate interests of both TeamViewer and our Customers, in order to enhance the users’ experience and to provide a more accurate and reliable service to our Customers and Users.
C.1.11. Using our DEX Services
Whenever you run the DEX Services client, the TeamViewer infrastructure registers whether the device is available for processing information about its status. To achieve that, it processes your IP address, your location, DEX ID, and your chosen user screen name. While sending device status information to the DEX platform, this data is exchanged between the TeamViewer infrastructure, the DEX platform, and the DEX client of your device. In addition, our servers will automatically collect certain remote connection metadata (so called logs, which can later be used to address and analyze technical bugs and difficulties).
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.2. Ensuring your security and that of others
The security of our customers, users and employees is extremely important for TeamViewer. To achieve these purposes, TeamViewer has implemented a number of processes and procedures, so that fraudulent or suspicious activities are identified, and TeamViewer may take appropriate action. These measures also serve the prevention of abuse and fraud by identifying abnormal or unexpected usage. To do so, we need to evaluate the usage of the Software in order to recognize abusive or abnormal patterns and thus to help protect our network and service integrity at any time. Doing so, we may process certain personal data, e.g., data associated with your remote connections, IP addresses, derived locations, various user interactions and patterns as well as device information (e.g., TeamViewer IDs). These processes are intended primarily to achieve the above aim i.e., to protect stakeholders as well as TeamViewer’s interests.
Subject to the Product, our users and customers also have the possibility to partake in the connection risk scoring (beta feature), which provides alerts within the Software on the possibly suspicious behavior of your connection partners. For these purposes, the results of our risk analysis are being used.
We will share information about the connecting user’s account with the recipient to establish that the connection is trusted. The user account data may include displayed country, domain of e-mail address, license status, age of account, VPN usage, etc.
If you believe we have blocked you and your devices in error, please contact our
customer support
in order to unblock your access.
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section is, performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR, or our legitimate interest and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
C.3. Conducting license audits
We may analyze your use of the Product and/or Server Services for security purposes, as well as for license auditing. To that end, we may use, and implement technical measures regarding the functionality of the Product and the Server Services to assess whether your usage pattern is in line with the indicated usage volume and thus with the chosen license type, and to detect whether the contractually agreed scope of use is being exceeded by customers or users in individual cases.
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.3.1. Free Version
If you are using our so-called Free Version of the Software as defined in the
EULA
, we may analyze your Product usage data in accordance with Sections A.1, B.1.1, B.2.2, as well as B.1.8 of our
EULA
to assess whether your usage pattern is in line with your indicated usage purpose and thus with the chosen license type. This assessment, which may also include an analysis of the domain of an email-address you have provided in the course of signing up for a TeamViewer Account (see above Section C.1.1), will result in a so called “commercial score”. Depending on this score, we may determine that a fee-based license, as opposed to a Free Version, is required for your usage pattern of our Product, and we will inform you accordingly.
If you continue to use our Product in a way that indicates a violation of Section B.1.8 of the
EULA
, we may limit or ultimately block your access to the Server Services and ask you to purchase a fee-based license. In certain cases, this may involve an automatic decision-making process, where TeamViewer systems are configured to automatically put in place a limitation or even a blocking of your use of the Product.
If you think you are using our Product within the scope of the Free Version license, you may submit a corresponding request by way of our online form, for which we ask you to submit your name, email-address, affected TeamViewer ID, and an explanation on your usage. TeamViewer will then analyze your submission and again evaluate your detected usage patterns. In the course of the evaluation process, we may also ask you to submit a declaration confirming your use of our Product for private, non-commercial purposes only. For this declaration, we may ask you to submit your name, postal address, explanation of your usage, and your signature.
C.3.2. Paid license
If you have purchased our paid license, we may from time to time monitor your use of our services for license audit purposes, especially, to check whether your use of the Software and its features is in line with your license scope. If we determine any discrepancies and especially, the overuse, we may notify you via in-product messaging and ask you to discontinue the overuse or alternatively, purchase additional licenses.
Please refer to Section B.1.4 of the
EULA
in this connection.
If you will not discontinue the overuse or purchase additional licenses, we may block your Server Services until the dispute is resolved or terminate the agreement with you.
We may also process certain personal data in connection with your payments. In case of the payment defaults, in addition to sending out payment reminders, we may block your Software and Server Services in accordance with our
EULA
, as well as involve external debt collection agency.
C.4. Support and Feedback
C.4.1. Processing your feedback
When you provide feedback concerning your experience when using TeamViewer Products (e.g. through our
User Focus Program
, rating our products, or by reporting bugs or feature requests), we will collect and process your TeamViewer Account ID (if you provide the feedback while logged-in), your country and language settings, as well as any information you submit in your inquiry  or rating (including attachments such as log files or screen shots), which may contain your email-address, your name, company information, phone number, license key, or your TeamViewer ID. You may also provide us with logs stored on your local device for analytical purposes. In such case we will only process your data for the purposes of resolving the issue.
In the User Focus Program, any information disclosed in a survey, interview or recording may be processed in connection with product improvement activities. This may contain your email address, your name, company information, phone number, license key, audio and/or video recordings and TeamViewer Account ID.
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section, is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR, our legitimate interest and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR or your consent as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR
C.4.2. Providing technical support and professional services
When you request technical support, we may collect and process your data for providing support, e.g., for IT fault analysis, troubleshooting and remote maintenance. We may also process server logs and logs from your device, as provided by you. When you order Professional Services from TeamViewer, we may access and process your data for provisioning the service, e.g., installation, configuration, customizations, integration of services in customer’s environment as well as related IT services, consulting and training.
The legal basis to process your personal data as outlined above under this Section is performance of our contract with you (i.e., the EULA) and thus as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.4.3. Bug Bounty Program (selected Products)
We embrace any responsible disclosure in order to make our Products and Services better. Therefore, we offer a clear guideline for ethical hackers by providing a
VDP
(Vulnerability Disclosure Policy) for selected Products which are subject to our choice. Our aim is to challenge ourselves by allowing you to investigate and discover various bugs or vulnerabilities pertaining to security exploits of our software.
You may participate in the so-called bug bounty or similar program anonymously. However, if you decide to submit your personal data, we may process it in order to properly identify you (e.g., your name, last name, pseudonym) as well as your contact information (e.g., email-address, postal address, phone number), your credentials, your country of residence and other personal information, as submitted by you.
The purpose of the processing is to work with you in order to resolve the bug and any associated topics around it. As mentioned above, you may also participate within the program anonymously.
The legal basis of this processing is fulfillment of the participation terms and conditions, i.e., Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
C.5. Marketing
TeamViewer may contact and inform its customers and users through in-product messages (using your TeamViewer ID and, if you are a registered user, your email-address) about changes to or improvements of our Products, entirely new products, or to provide you with tips on how to best use our Products as well as other useful information (e.g., on discounts, freebies or giveaways).
In determining whether and how we contact our customers and users, we may also process the license type, language and version of the Product, and/or country, and we may also draw on data we have gathered through analyses measures as described in Section C.5 of this Privacy Notice as well as Section C.6. of
our General Privacy Notice
.
If you would like to opt-out from receiving such in-product messages, please follow the instructions in
our Community
. For opting out from our email communication, please use the unsubscribe button included in the emails.
The legal basis to process your personal data as described under this Section is our legitimate interest and thus as described in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR on the basis of Section 7 para. 3 of the German Unfair Competition Act (UWG), or in some cases your consent, as defined in Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
C.6. App-stores
Some of our apps can be downloaded in Google Play as well as on Apple App Store. The app-stores usually provide the app developers (in this case, TeamViewer), with statistics of the downloads including ratings of the relevant app. Please note, that these data are provided to TeamViewer within the app-store directly based on download and ratings of the users of our app, including you.
The Legal basis for processing your personal data in this regard is our legitimate interest, pursuant to Art. 6 Sec. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
For more information on how your app-store process your personal data, please refer to their respective privacy policies:
Google Play
Apple AppStore
C.7. Processing within the scope of legal requirements
We may process your personal data to comply with applicable law or act upon valid legal proceedings, including inquiries from law enforcement or government agencies, to investigate or participate in civil discovery, litigation, or other adversarial legal proceedings.
The legal basis to process your personal data as outlined within this Section is compliance with a legal obligation, and thus Art. 6 para. 1 lit. c), or our legitimate interest and thus Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
D. Recipients
Our employees, who administer, maintain and further develop TeamViewer’s website, Products and Services may receive access to your personal data. To that end, TeamViewer has strong technical and organizational security measures to protect personal data against unauthorized disclosure to third parties and to ensure that only relevant individuals, who act within their job description and have a need-to-know interest in accessing any of your personal data, will have access to the data for which they have sufficient clearance.
In addition, we utilize services of external service providers (e.g., Microsoft, Amazon Web Services EMEA (SARL, 38 avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxemburg), Inxmail GmbH (Wentzingerstr. 17, 79106 Freiburg), Cloudfare (101 Townsend St San Francisco, CA 94107), etc.), as well as our affiliate network worldwide (e.g., TeamViewer entities in Greece, USA, Australia, Austria, England, India, Japan etc.). Furthermore, TeamViewer may transfer your personal data to third parties (e.g., Google, Microsoft) in order to ensure the security of its services, or the security of its customers.
All mentioned third-party providers and employees of such providers may receive access to personal data through the service they provide.
TeamViewer chooses all third-party service providers with due care, obligates them to confidentiality, and concludes data processing agreements with them in accordance with the standards of the GDPR, as far as necessary. Should you have any questions about third parties we use, please contact us at
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
TeamViewer will generally not transfer your personal data outside the EU and/or EEA. However, there are some exceptions to this rule, which include data transfers for group internal services provided from outside the EU, including Australia, USA and Armenia as an example.
Whenever TeamViewer transfers your personal data out of the EU or the EEA to countries that do not have a level of protection recognized as adequate by the EU, we will apply safeguards to adequately protect your personal data. In particular, we will conclude model contracts with corresponding entities in accordance with applicable laws. Please refer to this
LINK
to obtain further information on the Standard Contractual Clauses for the transfer of personal data to processors established outside the EU or EEA.
If you use our Product, contact us through the contact, support, and feedback features, and/or if you request a quote, TeamViewer employees that are responsible for the respective service will receive access to your personal data. Aside from TeamViewer employees, your personal data may be processed by employees of third-party services providers, who assist us in handling your requests, e.g., if you use our chat functionality on the website, speak to us on the phone (e.g., external call centers), or contact us through forms on certain website landing pages (e.g., employees of the website support suppliers).
If you post a comment in TeamViewer’s community or blog, your comment content and name/username will be publicly available and may appear in search engines. Aside from TeamViewer employees, employees of the hosting company may receive access to your personal data as described in Section C.3.
If you purchase a TeamViewer Product, TeamViewer employees concerned with processing such transactions will receive access to your data. We also use the services of third-party payment token providers, such as PPRO Latin America GmbH and Adyen N.V. respectively. In addition, our fraud prevention software may also process your data on our behalf.
In connection with hosting and processing your data on your behalf, we may use certain Subprocessors, e.g., Anexia Internetdienstleistungs GmbH (
Anexia
), Amazon Web Services, Stack IT KG Google or TeamViewer Austria GmbH, etc.
TeamViewer may transfer your personal data to third parties if we offer participation in campaigns, contests, reservations, or contract agreements in conjunction with a third party. In this case, you will be specifically informed about the transmission to the third parties.
For web analytics and (re-)marketing activities, we rely on a number of third-party providers, which will process personal data on our behalf as explained in more detail in
our Cookie Notice
.
TeamViewer may transfer your personal data to third-parties to undergo security and trust related operations, like Know-Your-Client (
KYC
) operations, scam or abuse detection, or any type of defensive action (e.g., fight against DDoS, etc.). Such third-parties are, but not limited to, Microsoft, Google, Anexia, etc.
Finally, TeamViewer uses external third-party service providers to help operate its business, such as providers of IT operation and maintenance services, (cloud) storage service providers and providers of (cloud) collaboration tools. Examples include Amazon Web Services, and Microsoft (Dynamics 365, Azure).
E.
Retention and deletion
TeamViewer retains your personal data for as long as is necessary according to the relevant legal basis for its processing. The exact retention period will thus depend on the categories of personal data and the processing purposes. In some cases, we are legally required to retain personal data for a certain period of time. Once this period has lapsed and a purpose for processing the data no longer exists, we will delete or anonymize the data in accordance with data protection obligations. The information about your TeamViewer account will be kept as long as your user relationship exists. In general, TeamViewer accounts are deleted after two years of account inactivity. Account inactivity means that you have not logged into your TeamViewer account with an active internet connection. Accounts are deemed active as long as they are connected or attached to a valid paid license. A deviating deletion term may apply, in particular due to regional requirements and/or security reasons.
F. Statutory/contractual requirement
You may choose not to provide your personal data or provide incomplete personal data. However, you should be aware that you may not be able to engage in a contractual relationship with us or receive adequate support from us.
G. Special processing cases
Please refer to Section C.6 of our General Privacy Notice in this regard.
H. Your Rights
You may contact us either in writing by email at
privacy@teamviewer.com
or via
web form
in order to exercise the following rights to the extent you are entitled to so under applicable law:
You have the right to request information about the processing of your personal data in accordance with Art. 13 and 14 GDPR (Right to information);
You may request access to your personal data as well as request a copy of your personal data (right of access, Art. 15 GDPR);
You may request that we supplement, correct or delete your personal data (Right to rectification, Art. 16 GDPR and Right to erasure, Art. 17 GDPR); the right of rectification also comprises the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement;
You may request that we restrict the processing of your personal data (Right to restriction of processing, Art. 18 GDPR);
You may request to receive your personal data, which you provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and transmit it without hindrance or have it transmitted to another controller (Right to data portability, Art. 20 GDPR).
You may object, at any time, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the processing of your personal data which is based on the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. The processing of your personal data will then be cancelled, unless we demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms or the processing is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims (Right to object, Art. 21 GDPR).
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority in relation to the processing of your personal data.
The relevant supervisory authority for TeamViewer is
Der Landesbeauftragte für den Datenschutz und die Informationsfreiheit, Lautenschlagerstraße 20, 70173 Stuttgart, Germany
.
Should you have any questions on the processing of your personal data by TeamViewer in relation to your contractual relationship, please contact
privacy@teamviewer.com
.
I. Compliance with the CCPA
Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act (
CCPA
), you will not receive discriminatory treatment for exercising your privacy rights. You may also designate an authorized agent to make a privacy request on your behalf.
J. Compliance with Brazilian LGPD
TeamViewer has checked the compliance topic with the Brazilian Data Protection Law Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (Law No. 13,709/2018) (
LGPD
) to ensure that our measures and procedures under the GDPR cover the topics within the LGPD. The privacy notice under the LGPD is available for Brazilian visitors and users under
www.teamviewer.com/en-us/privacy-notice
.
K. Changes to this Notice
TeamViewer may, from time to time, make amendments to this Privacy Notice to reflect the changes in our processing activities.
Privacy Notice for Cookies
Version as of July 2022
TeamViewer Germany GmbH and its affiliates take protection of your personal data very seriously. Personal data means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person, such as name, address, email-addresses, IP address, or user behavior etc. The following privacy notice (“
Cookie Notice
”) provides you with information about the processing of personal data in relation to our use of so-called “cookies”, pixels and similar technologies, (together, “
Cookies
”) on our websites, as well as their business purpose and how they allow us to improve our service and run our business. It also tells you how you can manage or delete the Cookies that are stored on your device or manage the use of Cookies.
A. Controller
TeamViewer Germany GmbH (“
TeamViewer
”), Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany is controller pursuant to Art. 4 para. 7 General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) concerning any processing of personal data for which we determine the purpose and means of processing. TeamViewer is responsible for the Cookies set on all of our websites.
The exception applies with regards to the sub-page
Investor Relations
(“
IR
”). For the cookies set on the IR sub-page, TeamViewer SE is the controller under the GDPR.
B. Data Protection Officer (DPO)
TeamViewer appointed an external data protection officer (DPO). In addition, TeamViewer established a dedicated Privacy team, which closely collaborates with the DPO. The Privacy team as well as the DPO can be reached at
privacy@teamviewer.com
or at TeamViewer Germany GmbH, for the confidential attention of the DPO, Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany.
C. All about the Cookies
C.1. What are the Cookies?
Cookies are small text files containing information related to your internet settings, which are downloaded by your browser to the device you use when you visit a website. Cookies are then sent back to the originating website (first-party Cookies) on each subsequent visit, or to another website that recognizes that Cookie (third-party Cookies). Cookies perform a variety of useful jobs, such as remembering your preferences, adapting the content that you see and improving your online experience.
C.2. When and how does TeamViewer place Cookies?
TeamViewer uses Cookies on its websites (such as teamviewer.com, login.teamviewer.com, teamViewerIOT.com, and other TeamViewer sub-domains such as login.teamviewer.com, get.teamviewer.com, www.lifear.com) and applications. Any device with which you are visiting these websites will receive at least some Cookies from TeamViewer, depending on the consent that you give when first visiting our website or changing your Cookie preferences at a later stage.
When you visit our websites for the first time with a specific device, we will ask you to choose your preferences through our Cookie banner (“
Banner
”). Within the Banner you can make a choice according to your wishes, either allowing us to set certain or all Cookies by category, limiting the setting of the Cookies or not selecting any at all. Please note, however, that some Cookies will always be active, and we do not ask for your consent for these. This applies for “strictly necessary” Cookies, because – as their name suggests – we need to place them for the proper functioning of our website (see also Strictly Necessary Cookies section below).
The legal basis for the collection and processing of personal data in this case is, therefore, your consent, Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a), Art. 49 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR or our legitimate interest, Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR respectively.
If you are using the Free Version software as defined in our EULA and Product Specifications, we may place certain third-party Cookies (e.g., Google Analytics) on your device regardless of your preferences based on contract pursuant to Section B.2.2 of our EULA. As specified in our EULA, a key element of and part of the product specification for the Free Version software is the display and receipt of personalized marketing messages in the software as well as the processing of personal data necessary to provide such personalization. In this context, we set certain cookies which enables TeamViewer to analyze your product usage as well as your browsing behavior on our websites. In doing so, we may assess your product usage history (e.g., how long or how often have you been using TeamViewer), how you interacted with our in-product messages, how often have you visited our websites or which pages have you looked at. This information then will help us determine the offers that are, in our opinion, most relevant for you on our website, ads or through in-product-messages.
Otherwise, you can change your preferences at any time in our Cookie Settings.
C.3. What types of Cookies are being used?
There are different types of Cookies used web-wide, that differ from each other by the various criteria, aims as well as the purposes. TeamViewer, as many other companies in the world, utilizes different sets of Cookies depending on which purpose we are pursuing. TeamViewer uses i.e., functional and strictly necessary Cookies in order to make our websites function properly and to display contents in accordance with your location (e.g., language settings), and we also use marketing and retargeting Cookies, e.g., Google Ads or Google Analytics.
Different types regarding the provider of the Cookie
TeamViewer uses both, first- and third-party Cookies. First party Cookies are those set by TeamViewer itself. All other Cookies are third party Cookies, from companies such as Google Analytics, Facebook, LinkedIn etc. In some cases, the information derived from these Cookies may allow us to associate information with an identifiable individual, i.e., personal data.
Different types regarding the duration of storage
Session Cookies
Session Cookies last only for the duration of your visit of our website and are deleted when you close your browser. These help us to identify that a user of a particular device is navigating from page to page, supporting website security or basic functionality. Many of the Cookies we use are session Cookies. For example, they help us to measure the average time you spend on our website.
Persistent Cookies
Persistent Cookies continue to exist even after you have closed your browser and allow a website to remember your actions and preferences, particularly remember you as an existing user. Sometimes persistent Cookies are used by websites to provide targeted advertising based upon the browsing history of the device. TeamViewer uses persistent Cookies in a few ways, for example to distinguish users of our website and/or our products.
Different types regarding the purpose of use
Both session as well as persistent Cookies can serve different purposes and may be placed either by TeamViewer or by a third party. We differentiate between
strictly necessary Cookies, performance Cookies, functional Cookies, and marketing and targeting Cookies.
a) Strictly necessary Cookies
These Cookies are essential in order to enable us to provide you with basic and security features of our website. Without these Cookies, certain services you have asked for cannot be provided, such as the use of areas of our website that are restricted to registered users (a Cookie, which identifies registered users to recognize them throughout the visit and upon return, e.g., within the login area of our Management Console) and webshop related services. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. These Cookies are not implemented to gather information about you for other purposes such as marketing or analytics.
b) Performance cookies
These Cookies are used to collect information about the performance of our website and your visit and use of our website, for example, the number of visitors that used our website and the pages that are popular among our visitors. These Cookies do not collect information that directly identifies a visitor, although they may collect the IP address of the device used to access the site. Such information is used for the purpose of improving our website and the general user experience. Without the performance Cookies we will not be able to improve our website and its functionalities to provide you with the best surfing experience. If you do not allow these Cookies, your visit to our site will not be counted, which will negatively impact us when trying to improve our website.
c) Functional Cookies
These Cookies allow TeamViewer’s website to remember your preferences, such as your username, language settings, and/or the region you are in. These Cookies help to provide enhanced, more personal features. They can also be used to remember changes you have made to text size, fonts and other parts of web pages that you can customize or provide services you have asked for such as watching a video, using the chat functionality or commenting on a blog. These Cookies do not track your browsing activity across other websites.
d) Marketing and Targeting Cookies
These Cookies are used to deliver adverts more relevant to you and your interests. They are also used to limit the number of times you see an advertisement as well as help measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns. These Cookies collect several pieces of information about your browsing habits. They are usually placed by advertising networks with our permission. They remember that you have visited a website and this information is shared with other organizations, such as media publishers. These organizations do this in order to provide you with targeted adverts more relevant to you and your interests. This type of advertising is called online behavioral advertising. Furthermore, these Cookies allow us to analyze your website browsing behavior and thus allows us to customize our product marketing approach, e.g., help us decide on whether, when, and how to inform or get in touch with you based on your interests.
D. Is personal data about you processed through Cookies?
Not all Cookies collect and process personal data about you. Instead, anonymous data may be used in many cases. In certain instances, however, Cookies will help us and our partners to collect and process personal data. Below sections will tell you more about the applicable categories of personal data and the purposes of the collection and processing that occur in this context. In general, it can be said that the data serves to provide the best possible experience to you when you use our websites and products and to further business interests of TeamViewer.
Please note that you can stop such collection and processing of personal data the same way you can stop the use of Cookies in general (see more under the Cookie Settings).
D.1. Personal data processed through web analytics and (re-)marketing applications
TeamViewer uses various web analytic applications and (re-)marketing tools, social media plugins, as well as third party integrated services. By and through these applications and tools, personal data as set out in this Cookie Notice are collected and may be combined with other personal data, we may collect from you.
1. Google Analytics and other analysis tools provided by Google
TeamViewer uses Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA / Google Ireland Ltd., Gordon House, 4 Barrow Street, Dublin, Ireland, or any other Affiliate of Google LLC (“
Google
“). When you visit our website for the first time and consent to our use of Cookies, you will be assigned a cookie with a unique user identification, i.e., a Google Analytics Client ID depending on your Cookie settings.
TeamViewer uses Google Analytics with the extension “anonymizeIp()”. Thereby, IP addresses are processed in a shortened form. The information generated by cookies about your use of this website is usually transmitted to and stored on a Google server in the USA. Only in exceptional circumstances will the full IP address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened there. The IP address transmitted by your browser as part of the Google Analytics data collection will not be merged with other data from Google.
The legal basis to conduct and use the results of these analyses is your consent, Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a), Art. 49 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
Other tools TeamViewer uses in this context that are also provided by Google include:
Google Tag Manager (a tag management system that allows TeamViewer to quickly and easily update tracking codes and related code fragments, collectively known as “tags” on our website or mobile app);
Google Big Query (an enterprise data warehouse that enables SQL queries using the processing power of Google’s infrastructure; TeamViewer uses Big Query to store and query data sets which are collected by Google services such as Google Analytics, and the Big Query data is used to build flexible reports for evaluating our website performance);
Google Display Network (used to measure the impact of unclicked Google Display Network ad impressions on the website, behavior of users, and conversions; please refer to https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/3105620 for further information); and
Google Optimize (for A/B testing, offering to analyze user behavior by showing slightly varied website contents to different user groups, depending on profile matching; thereby, TeamViewer analyzes its online services, improves its web offerings, and can create an interesting user journey).
TeamViewer uses data gathered through your Google Analytics Client ID as well as other data generated from Google’s web analytics applications in order to perform analyses of your interactions with our products, services, and websites. With the help of Google’s Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting, we will receive analyses on our users’ age, gender, and interest categories (please refer to https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/2799357?hl=en for further information).
Please visit the website https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en for an overview on Google’s approach on data protection for Google Analytics as well as their privacy policy: https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en.
2. Security and identification
TeamViewer may use “Google reCAPTCHA” (hereinafter “reCAPTCHA”) on our websites. This service is provided by Google Inc., 1600 Amphitheater Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA (“Google”).
reCAPTCHA is used to check whether the data entered on our website (such as on a contact form or log-in area) has been entered by a human or by an automated program. To do this, reCAPTCHA analyzes the behavior of the website visitor based on various characteristics. This analysis starts automatically as soon as the website visitor enters the website. For the analysis, reCAPTCHA evaluates various information (e.g., IP address, how long the visitor has been on the website, or mouse movements made by the user). The data collected during the analysis will be forwarded to Google.
For more information about Google reCAPTCHA and Google’s privacy policy, please visit Google information pages linked
here
and
here
.
The legal basis for the data processing in this connection is the legitimate interest of TeamViewer, Art. 6 para. 1 f) GDPR, since we have a legitimate interest in protecting its site from abusive automated crawling and spam
.
3. (Re-)Marketing/retargeting applications
a) Google AdWords Conversion and Google Remarketing
TeamViewer uses Google AdWords in order to generate attention for our products and services by conducting targeted advertising campaigns on third-party websites and apps. Data generated by such campaigns helps us to determine the success rate of individual campaigns. We aim at providing you with advertisement that is of interest to you, to make its website more interesting, and calculate advertising expenses accurately.
The legal basis for such processing of personal data is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a), Art. 49 para 1 lit. a) GDPR, therefore, your consent.
TeamViewer uses Ad Server Cookies, which scale certain parameters, such as display of ads or clicks by users. When you click on an ad delivered by Google that redirects you to our website, a cookie is stored on your computer by Google AdWords. These cookies usually expire within 30 days and are not supposed to be used to personally identify a user. In addition to these cookies, analytic values like a unique cookie ID, quantity of Ad impressions per storing, last impression and opt-out information (markings that the user does not want to be addressed any further) are usually stored. These cookies enable Google to recognize your internet browser.
If you visit certain pages on our website and provided the cookie stored on your device has not yet expired, we as well as Google are able to recognize that you clicked on an ad and were redirected to our website. Every Google AdWords customer receives a different cookie. Therefore, cookies cannot be tracked across different sites by TeamViewer, as is the case for all other AdWords customers. We merely receive statistical evaluations from Google. By and through these statistical evaluations, we can evaluate which advertisement campaign was particularly effective. Any additional data generated by the particular advertisement is not forwarded to TeamViewer; particularly, we cannot personally identify users through this information.
Through this (re-)marketing tool, your browser automatically connects to Google’s servers. Please note that scope and further use of the data processed by Google are subject to Google’s privacy policy and beyond TeamViewer’s control. We thus inform you based on our own knowledge:
By integrating AdWords, Google receives information that you visited a particular TeamViewer website or part thereof, and/or that you clicked on one of our advertisements. If you are registered with one of Google’s services, Google is able to match your visit to your Google account. Google may receive your IP address and/or may store it even if you are not registered with one of Google’s services and/or if you have not been logged in.
You may avoid tracking in various ways, e.g. through a setting of your browser software, particularly, by suppressing third party cookie installation in order to prevent receiving third-party ads; deactivating AdWords Cookies, by setting your browser so that cookies from www.googleadservices.com are being blocked; this can be done at https://adssettings.google.com/anonymous, however, such settings are deleted if you delete cookies; or permanently deactivating cookies in your browser under https://support.google.com/ads/answer/7395996.
Further information on Google’s approach to data privacy can be found under https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en. Alternatively, you can disable the use of cookies for interest-based advertising via the advertising network initiative, by following the instructions at http://optout.networkadvertising.org/?c=1#!/.
In addition to Google AdWords, TeamViewer uses the tool “Google Remarketing”. This is an application that allows us to address you again, even when you have left our website. After visiting our website and while you are surfing the internet, our advertisement can be displayed to you by and through this application. This is enabled by cookies stored on your device, which track and analyze user behavior on different websites for Google. Google can track your previous visits to our website.
According to its own statement, Google does not combine data gathered through Remarketing with any personal data Google may have stored about you. Furthermore, the data processed for these purposes is generally limited to pseudonymous information. If you do not want to be exposed to data processing through the Google Remarketing feature, you can disable it by changing the appropriate settings at https://adssettings.google.com/anonymous.
b) Social media tracking tools, including “tracking pixels”
We may also use other tools on our website allowing us to offer you a more personalized and engaged web experience by offering you advertisements on your social media channels that are more relevant to you. To that end, we use cookie-based tools offered by the following third-party social media providers:
Facebook Inc.
, 1601 S California Ave, Palo Alto, California 94304, USA; for further information on the implemented tool, please refer to https://developers.facebook.com/docs/facebook-pixel/implementation#base-code; additional information on data collection: https://www.facebook.com/help/186325668085084
LinkedIn Corporation
, 2029 Stierlin Court, Mountain View, California 94043, USA; for further information on the implemented tool and how to opt out of corresponding tracking, please refer to https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out; for further information on LinkedIn’s approach to privacy refer to: https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy?trk=uno-reg-guest-home-privacy-policy
Twitter Inc.
, 1355 Market St, Suite 900, San Francisco, California 94103, USA; for further information on the implemented tool and how to opt out of corresponding tracking, please refer to https://help.twitter.com/en/safety-and-security/privacy-controls-for-tailored-ads; for further information on Twitter’s approach to privacy refer to: https://twitter.com/en/privacy.
Microsoft Corp.
, One Microsoft Way, Redmond, WA 98052-6399, USA; for further information on the implemented tool and how to opt out, please refer to https://account.microsoft.com/privacy/ad-settings/signedout?lang=en-US; for further information on Microsoft’s approach to privacy refer to: https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-us/privacystatement.
In each case, we integrate snippets of code provided by these social media operators that load a small library of functions (sometimes referred to as “tracking pixels”, i.e., transparent, pixel-sized images embedded in websites with a tracking functionality). These functions enable us to track your activities on our website, such as URLs visited, domains visited, device(s) used, and, in particular, advertising conversions (i.e., actions counted when you interact with one of our ads, such as clicking it and purchasing our product afterwards). They rely on cookies placed by the mentioned third-party providers, which may also enable us to match our website visitors to respective user accounts on the respective social media platforms.
The legal basis for such processing of personal data is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a), Art. 49 para 1 lit. a) GDPR, e.g., your consent. Please take note of your options to opt-out of such tracking and remarketing mentioned above.
E. Supplementary information
Not all Cookies collect and process personal data about you. Instead, anonymous data may be used in many cases. In certain instances, however, Cookies We may embed external content from third party websites (e.g., Facebook, YouTube) within our website periodically. In addition to this, we sometimes partner with third parties who provide services for us which you can navigate to from our website. These third parties may use Cookies, you can find out about their approach to Cookies on their websites.
Privacy Notice of TeamViewer SE
Version as of April 2022
Introduction
We, TeamViewer SE, take protection of your personal data very seriously. The following notice provides an overview of how we ensure this protection and what kind of data is processed, and why. Personal data means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person, for example your name, address, email addresses, number of shares, the information which intermediary bank you are using.
A. Controller
TeamViewer SE, Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen,
ir@teamviewer.com
, is controller of your personal data pursuant to Art. 4 para. 7 General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”).
B. Data Protection Officer (DPO)
TeamViewer SE appointed Ms. Katja Hauser as external data protection officer, who can be reached at
privacy@teamviewer.com
, or at intersoft consulting services AG, DSB TeamViewer, Dürener Str. 189, 50931 Cologne.
C. Purpose of processing and respective legal basis
TeamViewer SE collects and processes different categories of personal data depending on the relevant purpose of the use, especially in connection with the management of investor and shareholder relations. The following sections outline the categories of data processed by us and respective purposes for such processing. If the legal basis for a processing is your consent, you may withdraw your consent at any time, such withdrawal however will not have any impact on the legitimacy of the processing itself prior to withdrawal of your consent.
I. Management of investor relations
We may process your personal data collected at the events or roadshows, such as your name and contact information, as well as in connection with our Investor Relations News Alert (in case you have subscribed to it) or if you decide to get in touch with us via email or phone. Legal basis for the processing is your consent, Art. 6, para. 1 lit (a) GDPR or our legitimate interest, Art. 6, para. 1 lit (f) GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to answer your questions, provide information and maintain our investor relations.
II. Processing of personal data of shareholders and their representative
We may process your personal data such as your name, contact information, your email address, your representative, your intermediary bank, number of shares in connection with you purchasing shares in TeamViewer SE. Such information is used to fulfil our legal obligations (e.g. inform the regulatory bodies if shareholders reach certain levels of share ownership) as well as organize annual shareholder meetings (“
Shareholder Meeting
”), including but not limited to preparing and sending out the invitations, issuing voting cards or respectively voting right tickets, compiling the list of participants and processing the power of attorneys. Legal basis for the processing is the legal obligation under stock corporation law to which we are a subject to, Art. 6, para. 1 lit (c) GDPR.
III. Processing of personal data in connection with Shareholder Meetings
We may conduct our Shareholder Meetings either in person or without presence using the means of remote communication (“
virtual Shareholder Meeting
”) with the option of participating by an electronic connection.
In order to enable shareholders and their representatives to participate in the Shareholder Meeting (e.g. by checking their eligibility to participate) and to exercise their rights at the Shareholder Meeting (including granting and revoking powers of attorney and instructions) as well as to ensure a proper conduct of the Shareholder Meeting, the observance of voting bans, the lawful adoption of resolutions and evaluation of cast votes at the Shareholder Meeting, we may process the name, contact information, registration number, number of shares, voting behavior and results, submitted questions, statements (in writing or via video message), motions, counter-motions, nominations, instructions and objections of our shareholders and their representatives, and login information for our designated shareholder portal (shareholder/voting card number and password). Legal basis for the processing is the legal obligation under stock corporation law to which we are a subject to, Art. 6, para. 1 lit (c) GDPR.
The entire Shareholder Meeting may be broadcast live and publicly accessible on the Internet by means of video and audio transmission. If the Shareholder Meeting is conducted in person and you enter the recording area or make a verbal contribution during recording activities, this live broadcast will include your appearance and verbal contribution. The legal basis for this processing is Art. 6, para. 1 lit (f) GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to enable interested shareholders and the public to follow the Shareholder Meeting via the Internet in accordance with the express permission in the German Stock Corporation Act and our by-laws.
Insofar as we take down in shorthand your verbal contributions during the Shareholder Meeting without being legally obliged to do so, this is done to ensure the proper conduct of the Shareholder Meeting and to be able to deal with your questions and motions. The stenographic minutes will not be published. The legal basis for this processing is Art. 6, para. 1 lit (f) GDPR and our legitimate interest is to ensure that the Shareholder Meeting is executed properly and that our shareholders’ participation rights can be realized in the best possible way.
If you make use of the opportunity to submit questions, statements (in writing or via video message), motions, counter-motions, nominations or other requests that are dealt with or made available during or before the Shareholder Meeting, this will generally be done by stating your name, which other participants of the Shareholder Meeting may take note of. If we are not legally obliged to state your name in this context, the legal basis for the processing is Art. 6, para. 1 lit (f) GDPR and our legitimate interest is to inform the other shareholders of the name of the applicant.
IV. Processing of personal data in connection with the shareholder portal
If we conduct the Shareholder Meeting virtually, the shareholders and their representatives will not be able to physically attend the meeting. They can, however, follow the entire meeting via video and audio transmission through the designated shareholder portal. In connection with the virtual Shareholder Meeting we will process your voting card number, log-in password, type of the power of attorney and personal data of your representative, as well as the instructions issued in connection with the Shareholder Meeting and any other information submitted by you in the shareholder portal. Legal basis for the processing is the legal obligation under stock corporation law to which we are a subject to, Art. 6, para. 1 lit (c) GDPR.
If we conduct a virtual Shareholder Meeting and provide the shareholder portal to enable you to conveniently manage your shareholder data, we will collect and process certain personal data on the web server log files, when you visit our shareholder portal in order to log in to attend the virtual Shareholder Meeting, manage your shareholder data or exercise your shareholder’s rights:
Date and time of the request
Notification whether the request was successful
Requested URL
Referrer URL (the previously visited page), if your browser sends this information
Type of used web browser and operating system used
IP address
Port by which the access was made
Actions performed within the portal
Session ID and data
Successful logins and logouts with the time stamp
Your browser automatically transfers this data to us when you visit our shareholder portal.
Legal basis for the processing is our legitimate interest, Art. 6, para. 1 lit (f) GDPR, since we have a legitimate interest in making the shareholder portal available to you and your representatives so that you can exercise your shareholder rights in a user-friendly manner and participate in the virtual Shareholder Meeting.
D. Cookies
If we use cookies in the provision of the shareholder portal, we will only do so if this is necessary for the operation of the shareholder portal or if you have given your consent. In this case, when you visit the shareholder portal, we will inform you in a pop-up window about our cookies and associated data processing before using cookies and, if necessary, ask you for your voluntary consent.
E. Data Sources
If you are a shareholder, we receive your personal data either directly from you or from the custodian credit institutions or intermediaries who are involved in the deposit of shares you purchased.
If you act as representative of a shareholder, we receive your personal data from the shareholder who granted you the power of attorney and directly from you as far as your behavior during the Shareholder Meeting or your use of the shareholder portal is concerned.
F. Recipients
TeamViewer SE’s employees, who administer, maintain and manage our internal processes, will have access to your personal data. To that end, TeamViewer SE has strong technical and organizational security measures to protect personal data against unauthorized disclosure to third parties and to ensure that only relevant individuals, who act within their job description and have a need-to-know interest in accessing any of your personal data, will have access to the data for which they have sufficient clearance.
Aside from TeamViewer SE’s employees, your personal data may be processed by employees of third-party services providers, who assist us in our daily business, such as providers of IT operation and maintenance services, (cloud) storage service providers and providers of (cloud) collaboration tools, as well as PR agencies. We use certain service providers in order to provide services typical for the capital market, such as EQS Group AG and Nasdaq Corporate Solutions International Ltd. for the management of investor relations as well as Link Market Services GmbH for the management of shareholder relations and Shareholder Meetings. Link Market Services GmbH also operates the shareholder portal used for organizing virtual Shareholder Meetings, exclusively on our behalf and in accordance with our instructions.
TeamViewer SE selects all third-party service providers with due care, obligates them to confidentiality, and concludes data processing agreements (DPAs) with them (including the providers listed above) in accordance with the standards of the GDPR, as applicable. Should you have any questions about third parties we use, please contact us at
ir@teamviewer.com
.
In addition to above cases, your personal data may also be disclosed during or in connection with the Shareholder Meetings. If you, as a shareholder, make use of the opportunity to submit questions and your questions are dealt with during the Shareholder Meeting, this will generally be done by stating your name. The above applies likewise regarding the submission of statements (in writing or via video message), the publication of which will show your name and, in the case of a statement via video message, images of yourself. If you submit items for the agenda, motions, counter-motions or nominations that we have to make publicly available, e.g. on our company’s website, before the Shareholder Meeting pursuant to our obligations under stock corporation law, this will also generally be done by stating your name. Other participants of the Shareholder Meeting or even the public may take note of this. Furthermore, other shareholders, their representatives where applicable or other participants of the meeting can view the personal data contained in the participant list during the Shareholder Meeting and, if applicable, up to two years thereafter in accordance with Sec. 129 of the German Stock Corporation Act (AktG).
TeamViewer SE will generally not transfer your personal data outside the EU and/or EEA. However, there are some exceptions to this rule, which include data transfers for group internal IT services provided from outside the EU, including Australia, USA and Armenia. TeamViewer SE will otherwise transfer your personal data outside the EU and/or EEA only when required to do so by law or in case of orders from a competent authority. Currently we transfer personal data to our provider Nasdaq Corporate Solutions International Ltd. in the US. Legal basis for such transfer is a DPA with EU standard contractual clauses.
Whenever TeamViewer SE transfers your personal data out of the EU or the EEA to countries that do not have an adequate level of data protection recognized by the EU, we will apply safeguards to adequately protect your personal data. In particular, we will conclude standard contractual clauses with corresponding entities and /. Please refer to
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/data-transfers-outside-eu/model-contracts-transfer-personal-data-third-countries_en
to obtain further information on the Standard Contractual Clauses for the transfer of personal data to processors established outside the EU or the EEA.
We will not share your personal data with local authorities or courts except where we are required to do so by applicable law, a court order or a legally binding injunction. We may be obliged to pass on your personal data to other recipients, such as when publishing voting rights notifications in accordance with the provisions of the German Securities Trading Act, or to authorities in order to comply with statutory notification obligations (e.g. to financial or criminal prosecution authorities).
G. Retention periods for personal data
Your personal data will be deleted once you withdraw consent, or once the purpose for processing has ceased to exist. In some cases, TeamViewer SE is legally obligated to retain data for a certain period of time. Your personal data will be deleted or anonymized as soon as they are no longer required for the purposes listed under Section C. and if the deleting or anonymizing does not conflict with legal requirements for proof and storage.
H. Statutory/contractual requirement
You may choose not to provide your personal data or provide incomplete personal data. However, by not providing your personal data, we may not be able to provide you with the relevant service or support, e.g. enable you to participate in our Shareholder Meeting or use all of the functionalities of our website; where we ask for consent and you choose not to provide it, or you block, disable or delete cookies, we may not be able to provide you with the information or service requested.
I. Your rights
You may contact us, e.g. under ir@teamviewer.com, in order to exercise the following rights to the extent you are entitled to under applicable law:
You may request access to your personal data as well as request a copy of your personal data (right of access, Art. 15 GDPR);
You may request that we supplement, correct or delete your personal data (Right to rectification, Art. 16 GDPR and Right to erasure, Art. 17 GDPR); the right of rectification also comprises the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement;
You may request that we restrict the processing of your personal data (Right to restriction of processing, Art. 18 GDPR);
You may request to receive your personal data, which you provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and transmit it without hindrance or have it transmitted to another controller (Right to data portability, Art. 20 GDPR);
You may object, at any time, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the processing of your personal data which is based on the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. The processing of your personal data will then be cancelled, unless we demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms or the processing is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims (Right to object, Art. 21 GDPR).
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority in relation to the processing of your personal data. In order to lodge a complaint, please contact the supervisory authority competent for your place of residency or alternatively, you may contact “Der Landesbeauftragte für den Datenschutz und die Informationsfreiheit, Lautenschlagerstraße 20, 70173 Stuttgart, Germany“.
Should you have any questions, please contact
ir@teamviewer.com
.
J. Changes to this Notice
TeamViewer may, from time to time, make amendments to this notice to reflect the changes in our processing activities.
PRIVACY STATEMENT – BRAZIL
Version as of March 2024
This Privacy Annex for users located in Brazil supplements the information contained in the
TeamViewer Privacy Policies
located at www.teamviewer.com/en-us/privacy-policy and applies solely to visitors, users and others who reside in Brazil (“consumers” or “you”). We adopt this annex to comply with the Brazilian Data Protection Law Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (Law No. 13,709/2018) (“LGPD”). Any terms defined in the LGPD have the same meaning when used in this annex.
LGPD
On September 18, 2020, the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) came into effect for Brazilian residents. In addition to the rights outlined in our Privacy Policies, as a user located in Brazil, you may be able to exercise the following rights with respect to your personal information that we have collected, subject to certain limitations:
The right to confirmation of the existence of the processing.
You have the right to ask that we confirm whether we process your personal data.
The right to access the data.
You have the right to access the personal data we hold about you and certain information about how we use it and who we share it with, including information about any public and private entities we have shared your personal data with.
The right to correct incomplete, inaccurate or out-of-date data.
If you want to correct or revise any of the data we retain on you, you may do so by accessing your account and the information contained within it.
The right to anonymize, block, or delete unnecessary or excessive data or data that is not being processed in compliance with the LGPD.
Please note that, depending on the request, this may result in a suspension or discontinuation of certain services and may be governed by legal and/or contractual retention guidelines.
The right to the portability of data to another service or product provider, by means of an express request.
We provide you with the ability to move any of your account data to a third party, at any time.
The right to delete personal data processed with the consent of the data subject.
You have a right to request the permanent deletion of your data, subject to certain exceptions. However, please note that exercising this right may result in a suspension or discontinuation of services and may also be governed by legal and/or contractual retention guidelines.
The right to information about the possibility of not giving consent and about the consequences of the refusal.
You have the right to ask us to provide information about the possibility of not giving consent for the processing of your personal data and the consequences of such refusal.
The right to revoke consent.
Please note that not all of these rights listed above are absolute, and limitations/exceptions apply in some cases. For example, we may not be able to fully comply with your request if we are bound by certain legal restrictions or contractual requirements, but in those circumstances, we will still respond to notify you of such a decision.
Exercising Data Portability and Deletion Rights
To exercise the data portability and deletion rights described above, please submit a verifiable consumer request to us by contacting us under
privacy@teamviewer.com
, at 1-800-638-0253, or
submitting a ticket
on our website.
We will need to verify your identity before processing your request. The verifiable consumer request must:
We will need to verify your identity before processing your request. The verifiable consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or a legal representative.
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate and respond to it.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information relates to you. Making a verifiable consumer request does not require you to create an account with us. We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing and Format
We endeavor to respond to a verifiable consumer request within thirty (30) days. The response we provide may explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request, if applicable. For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide your personal information that is readily useable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
Payment Processor Terms
For orders placed in Brazil, PPRO Payment Services (“PPRO”) may provide you with payment processing services. In such cases, once the registration on the TeamViewer website is completed, the user will be able to choose among the local payment methods that PPRO makes available. The user acknowledges and declares that, before making the purchase, they knew of and had access to the information about the goods and services offered, in addition to the specific conditions related to the user's rights, according to the payment instrument used at the time of purchase fully and unlimitedly exempting PPRO from any liability in relation to the purchase carried out on the TeamViewer website. The user also declares they are aware and agrees to only provide correct and truthful information when making the purchase, fully and unlimitedly exempting PPRO from any responsibility for the data provided.
Changes to Our Privacy Annex
We reserve the right to amend this privacy annex at our discretion and at any time.
Contact Information
If you have any questions or comments about this annex, our Privacy Policies, the ways in which we collect and use your personal information, your choices and rights regarding such use, or wish to exercise your rights under Brazilian law, you may contact us at:
TeamViewer
Attn: LGPD Data Processing Officer Committee
5741 Rio Vista Drive
Clearwater, FL 33760
United States of America
LGPDprivacy@teamviewer.com
1-800-638-0253
Data Protection Information Sheet for TeamViewer Customers
Version as of July 17th, 2023
This Data Protection Information Sheet provides an overview of how TeamViewer Germany GmbH, Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany (hereinafter “TeamViewer” or “we”) collects and processes personal data of its customers.
Processing as Processor.
When you use TeamViewer software and services as a customer (hereinafter “Customer” or “you”) and you are not a natural person, using the software or services in a purely personal or family activity (cf. Art. 2(2)(c) EU General Data Protection Regulation, “GDPR”), TeamViewer processes personal data in the meaning of Art. 4 GDPR and acts as Processor, whereas you act as Controller (Art. 28 GDPR). In the following, in addition to our
TeamViewer DPA
and related
annexes
, as amended from time to time, we summarize what personal data we collect, process or use and what rights data subjects are entitled to in connection with the use of our software and services.
Processing as Controller.
In addition, we process personal data as “controller” under the GDPR when providing our software and services. Information on such processing activities in accordance with Art. 13, 14 GDPR can be found in our
Privacy Notice for TeamViewer Products
.
Information on data processing.
In connection with the use of TeamViewer software and services, we perform the processing activities described in
Annex 1
to our DPA, as amended from time to time. In connection with these processing activities, we use subcontractors, as set forth in
Annex 3
to our DPA, as amended from time to time.
Technical and organizational measures.
When processing personal data, TeamViewer complies with Art. 32 GDPR and implements appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure a level of security appropriate to the risk, taking into account the state of the art, the costs of implementation and the nature, scope, context and purposes of the processing as well as the risk of varying likelihood and severity for the rights and freedoms of natural persons. The measures adopted are specified in TeamViewer’s overview of technical and organizational measures (TOMs,
Annex 2
to our DPA), as amen-ded from time to time.
Security of processing.
Taking into account the type of processing and the personal data available to TeamViewer, TeamViewer supports the Customer with appropriate technical and organizational measures to comply with Art. 32 – 36 GDPR, in particular with regard to the security of processing, notification of a personal data breach to the supervisory authority, communication of a personal data breach to the data subject, data protection impact assessments as well as the consultation with supervisory authorities.
Data protection by design and by default.
Information on how TeamViewer protects personal data by design and by default can be found in TeamViewer’s overview of technical and organizational measures (Section 6 in our TOMs,
Annex 2
to the DPA).
Assistance to the Customer in the execution of requests of data subjects.
TeamViewer assists the Customer with appropriate technical and organizational measures in the execution of requests to exercise the rights of data subjects. If a data subject contacts us directly to exercise his or her rights pursuant to Art. 12 et. seq. GDPR, we will immediately forward this request to the Customer.
Rights of data subjects towards TeamViewer.
Under the conditions set forth therein, the GDPR grants data subjects the following rights, which the data subject may exercise towards TeamViewer as described in the
Privacy Notice for TeamViewer Products
:
Right of access (Art. 15 GDPR);
Right to rectification (Art. 16 GDPR);
Right to erasure (Art. 17 GDPR);
Right to restriction of processing (Art. 18 GDPR);
Right to data portability (Art. 20 GDPR);
Right to object (Art. 21 GDPR).
In addition, we inform data subjects in accordance with Art. 13 and 14 GDPR when we obtain personal data from them or from another source.
Data subjects may assert their rights by e-mail to privacy@teamviewer.com, via a support ticket or in writing to TeamViewer Germany GmbH, Bahnhofsplatz 2, 73033 Göppingen, Germany.
Data protection officer.
TeamViewer has appointed an external data protection officer who can be contacted at privacy@teamviewer.com. You are also free to contact the relevant data protection authority, Der Landesbeauftragte für den Datenschutz und die Informationsfreiheit Baden-Württemberg, Lautenschlagerstraße 20, 70173 Stuttgart, Germany.
Further Information on security measures and certificates.
Further information on security and data protection measures and our certificates of TeamViewer and its partners (e.g., ISO 9001, SOC2, SOC3, HIPPA/HITECH and ISO 27001) can be found in the TeamViewer
Trust Center
.
Sub-policy 4
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated May 28, 2024
This Privacy Policy applies to: (i) use of the AppsFlyer owned and operated Websites (appsflyer.com, onelink.me and their subdomains); (ii) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conference events, emails etc.; and (iii) any other product or activity that links to, or otherwise references, this privacy policy (collectively, the “Marketing Platforms“). We respect your privacy rights and value your trust. This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, receive, use, store, share, transfer, and process your personal information, as well as your rights in determining what we do with the information that we collect or hold about you.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use by customers of the AppsFlyer service, which is described under our
Services Privacy Policy
.
Information We Collect
When using or interacting with our Marketing Platforms, we may collect or receive the following types of information (collectively, “Information”).
“Personal Information” such as name, email, contact details or any other personal content that you provide to us whether through a form or field on our website or any other communication (e.g. email, phone, post etc.).
“Technical Information” such as browser type, operating system, device type, IP address and other similar technical information typically received from a browser or device automatically when visiting or interacting with our Marketing Platforms. This may include the referring URL that led you to our website.
“Usage Information” such as the pages you visited on our website, where you clicked, searches performed on our website and other similar information related to how you have used our website. It may also include information related to whether you receive, opened or clicked on any links in an email sent to you.
We understand that certain Technical information or Usage Information may, either alone or when combined with other data, be deemed personal data under various laws and jurisdictions and we are committed to treating such data in compliance with applicable laws.
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
Depending on the type of Information, we may collect or receive Information in the following ways:
When you voluntarily share Information with us. For example, when you register to one of our events, request that we contact you through our online forms, submit your CV, or when you request to receive certain content that we may make available (e.g. research and white papers).
Through use of cookies and other similar technologies (e.g. HTML5 Local Storage, LSO, web beacons, JavaScript, etc.). These technologies help us to analyze how our Marketing Platforms are used and to tailor content that is relevant to you. It also helps us to deliver more relevant advertisements to you on our own or third party sites. For more information on such technologies, including how to manage your cookie preferences please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information obtained from third party sources. This includes Information received through the various business support tools and services that we use (e.g. marketing platforms, analytics services etc.) and public sources such as social media sites. We may combine the Information received through these sources with other Information we have in order to ensure our records are up to date and so that we are able to provide you with relevant content.
You have choices in how we collect and use Information. See the “
Your Choices
” section below for more information.
The Purposes
We use Information for the following purposes:
To process your inquiries and to respond to your requests. For example, when you contact us to learn more about our products or services or when you request to receive certain materials from us (e.g. white papers, research papers, product and services information). Additionally, if you submit your CV to us, we use it to evaluate your candidacy (including by assessing your qualifications and skills).
To send you information related to our services and products that we believe may interest you, such as newsletters or product and service updates. Such communications will be sent to you when you have chosen to receive such communication or when we have a legitimate interest to market our products and services. In any event, you will always be able to opt-out of receiving such communications. Opting out may be done either directly in the communication received or through the ways described in the instructions in the “
Your Choices
” section below.
To understand how you have used our Marketing Platforms and to customize them in accordance with your interests and past actions and choices. We do this based on our legitimate interest to operate our Marketing Platforms, diagnose any problems with the Marketing Platforms and to improve the Marketing Platforms and your experience when navigating through them.
In our legitimate interest to prevent fraud or harm to us or to any third party, and ensure the security of our network and services.
Where it is necessary for AppsFlyer to comply with its legal obligations and to exercise and enforce its legal rights.
We may use certain third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Who We Share Information With
In order to conduct our business and operate our Marketing Platforms, we may share Information with various third parties, such as:
Our subsidiary companies and global branches.
Third parties that help us operate our Marketing Platforms (e.g. hosting company, recruitment platforms and agencies, payment processors, business management and email distribution service providers and other similar service providers). These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When required by law, such as to comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and other lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
Legal authorities, consultants, advisors or service providers when required to investigate, respond to, or prevent, fraud; or when required to ensure the security of our network and services and protect the safety of AppsFlyer or the public.
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, Information may be transferred to the merging or acquiring company, as well as to any advisors representing a party during discussions of such merger or acquisition.
AppsFlyer resellers, agents, partners or service providers acting on our behalf in connection with the offering of AppsFlyer’s products or services.
Third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Without derogating from the foregoing, AppsFlyer may publish general aggregate and unidentifiable information (e.g. statistical information) relating to use of its Marketing Platforms.
Cross Border Data Transfers and Mechanisms
We may need to transfer Information to countries where we and/or our service providers operate. Such countries may be different from the country in which the data originated and where data protection laws may not be equivalent to, or offer the same protection as, those in your country. By using our Marketing Platforms, you agree to any such transfers. In any event, where appropriate given the nature of services, we will put in place agreements with our service providers to ensure a level of privacy consistent with the terms of this policy.
With regards to the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
AppsFlyer Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. AppsFlyer Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as well as to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view AppsFlyer’s certification, please visit
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over AppsFlyer Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, and in case of onward transfer of data to third parties, AppsFlyer maintains liability.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, AppsFlyer is committed to resolving any complaints arising regarding our processing of your personal data. You may direct your queries to privacy@appsflyer.com and, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we are committed to referring unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF to Truste, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://trustarc.com/dispute-resolution/
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of Truste are provided at no cost to you and allow for binding arbitration.
Protecting Your Information
We strive to meet the highest standards of security measures across our business units. We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures based on industry-leading standards. Such measures are designed to protect against unauthorized access or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against accidental loss, destruction or damage of Personal Information. As part of such measures, we have established various policies and procedures that guide us, including in respect of asset management, access management, physical security, people security, product security, cloud and network infrastructure security, third-party security, vulnerability management, security monitoring, and incident response.
Information Storage and Retention
We may store Information on our own servers as well as those operated by third party data hosting providers. As specified in Section 5 above (Cross Border Transfers), such servers may be located worldwide. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary to pursue the purpose of the collection. We may also retain your Personal Information for such time needed to pursue our legitimate business interests, in connection with any legal claims and compliance with legal obligations. When we use your information for direct marketing purposes, we will retain your data until you opt-out from receiving the marketing materials; provided that we will need to retain certain information to maintain a record of your request.
Modifications to This Policy
AppsFlyer may amend this Privacy Policy at any time, provided that in the event of a material change we shall provide notice on this page and/or a note near the link to this page. The updates shall apply immediately for new Information collected or provided as of the day of the update and following thirty (30) days for any Information collected or provided to AppsFlyer prior to the update date. If you do not agree to the terms of the new policy you are requested to contact the Legal Department using the contact details listed in Section 11 below. We encourage you to periodically review this page for any updates.
Your Choices
We provide you with various choices on how we may use Information in connection with: (i) our marketing activities; and (ii) our use of cookies and similar technologies to serve your interest-based advertisements and to analyze usage of our Marketing Platforms.
You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails, accessing the email preferences in your account settings page, or you can contact us at
https://www.appsflyer.com/company/contact/
. You can manage your preferences related to our use of cookies and similar technologies that we use, among other things, to provide you with targeted interest-based advertisements and to analyze your use of our Marketing Platforms – please see our
Cookie Policy
for instructions. Additionally, certain advertisers (including Google) we work with may be members of NAI and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance. You may opt-out from such advertisers’ services here or at the following link:
https://youradchoices.com/
In addition, the laws of some jurisdictions may provide you with various rights in connection with our processing of certain Information. Such rights may include:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. For any additional information regarding such rights or to exercise any such rights please contact AppsFlyer at: privacy@appsflyer.com
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Social Media and Third Party Services
Our website may offer a blog with ‘comments’ section and various social media features, such as a ‘share’ button or links to third party websites and services, including Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ and Facebook. When using any such features, certain information may be collected by such third parties, including your IP address or which page you are visiting on our website, and such third parties may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Any data collected by such third parties is governed by such third party’s privacy policy. You are encouraged to carefully review such third party privacy policies.
Children’s Privacy
AppsFlyer does not knowingly collect or process personal data from or with respect to children under the age of 16, and you must be 16 years of age or older in order to establish an account for AppsFlyer’s Services. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe that your child under the age of 16 has submitted his or her personal data or other data without your consent, permission, or authorization – please let us know immediately, and we will promptly act to remove your child’s data from our database, cease the use of such data and inform any other party we suspect to have access to such data to do the same.
California Privacy Rights
We may collect personal information about California residents who are afforded additional rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (the “CCPA“). If you are a California resident, you can see more details about the types of personal information we have collected from you in the past 12 months and may collect from you in Section 1 above (
Information We Collect
) and how we collect such personal information in Section 2 above (
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
). The purposes for which we collect your personal information are further described in Section 3 above (
The Purpose
). We do not share your personal information with any third party except as further described in Section 4 above (
Who We Share Information With
). Please refer to the other terms of this Privacy Policy to see further rights afforded to you and how we use your personal information.
We do not “Sell” (as defined in the CCPA) your personal information which we have collected or may collect and in the event we will Sell your personal information, we will notify you by updating this Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 8 above (
Modifications to this Policy
) and we will provide you with the option of opting out of such “sale”.
You, as a California resident, have certain rights regarding your personal information pursuant to the CCPA, subject to certain restrictions under applicable laws, including the rights to access your personal information, to delete your personal information, and to opt out of the “sale” of your personal data. You may request any of these by contacting us via email at
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. Upon your request, we will verify that you are the person making this request and in order to do so, we may request identification documents from you.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Website Privacy Policy, the information we collect, the practices of AppsFlyer, or your dealings with the Marketing Platforms, please contact us or our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany Schönhauser Allee 180, 10119 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49 30 166373500).
Our Cookies Policy
AppsFlyer respects your privacy as our website user. We use cookies to improve your user experience and for remarketing. Some of this data may be shared with select partners. See our
cookies policy
for more information.
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Customize
Cookie Preference Center
AppsFlyer uses Cookies to provide, maintain, and improve our websites, to optimize our offerings and marketing activities, and to provide our visitors and users with a better experience, for example, in order to maintain your preferences, to better secure our websites, to identify technical issues, and to monitor and improve the overall performance of our websites.
More information
Allow All
Please select which Cookies you approve, you may choose all options.
Always Active
Necessary Cookies are enabled for the assurance and function of a properly run website, and they cannot be disabled. They are usually only set in response to actions permitted by you, such as, enabling functions like navigation and access to secure areas of the website. These Cookies do not store personal information that will be used for other purposes.
Performance Cookies
These Cookies provide us with aggregated (anonymous) insights into website enhancement and performance improvement. These cookies allow us to measure and improve the performance of our Sites. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the website.
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These Cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalization through our Sites and allow for a better user experience. These may be set by us (first-party Cookies) or by third-party providers who work with us (third-party Cookies).
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 5
https://firebase.google.com/:
Skip to main content
firebase.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Build
More
Run
More
Solutions
Pricing
Docs
More
Community
More
Support
Go to console
Build
Go to Build
Build Products
App Check
App Hosting
Authentication
Cloud Functions
Cloud Storage
Data Connect
Extensions
Firebase ML
Firestore
Genkit
Hosting
Realtime Database
Vertex AI in Firebase
Generative AI
Run
Go to Run
Run Products
A/B Testing
App Distribution
Cloud Messaging
Crashlytics
Google Analytics
In-App Messaging
Performance Monitoring
Remote Config
Test Lab
Overview
Fundamentals
Build
Run
Reference
Samples
Learn
Events
Stories
Firebase
Send feedback
Firebase is back at Cloud Next on April 9 - 11.
Register now.
Make your app
the best it can be with Firebase and generative AI
Build & run modern, AI-powered experiences users love with Firebase, a platform designed to support you throughout your app development journey. Backed by Google and trusted by millions of businesses around the world.
Get started
Try demo
arrow_forward
Build
Get to market quickly and securely with products that can scale globally
Build AI-powered experiences into your apps and accelerate app development with managed infrastructure, powered by Google Cloud, so you can focus on what matters most.
App Hosting
Data Connect
Genkit
View all Build products
Run
Run your app with confidence and deliver the best experience for your users
Launch, monitor, and iterate with AI-assistive tools that help you optimize your app's quality and experience.
App Distribution
Crashlytics
Remote Config
View all Run products
Vertex AI
in Firebase
Genkit
Gemini
in Firebase
Generative AI
Easily integrate Firebase with Gemini and the latest AI technology from Google
View generative AI options
Vertex AI
in Firebase
Genkit
Gemini
in Firebase
More Google and third-party integrations
Easily integrate Firebase with your team's favorite tools.
Project IDX
Flutter
Google Ads
AdMob
Google Marketing Platform
Google Play
Data Studio
BigQuery
Slack
Jira
Android Studio
Extensions
Install pre-packaged, open source bundles of code to automate common development tasks
Explore Extensions
Stream to BigQuery
Search with Algolia
Run Payments with Stripe
Stream to BigQuery
Search with Algolia
Run Payments with Stripe
Easy to integrate on iOS, Android, and the Web
Firebase provides detailed documentation and cross-platform app development SDKs, to help you build and ship apps for iOS, Android, the Web, Flutter, Unity, and C++.
View all docs
News & events
Keep up to date on everything Firebase
View all news
Monitor your Genkit features in production
Monitor your Genkit features in production
Read more
Medium
How to Develop Firebase Genkit Flows
Genkit includes a powerful tool called the Genkit Developer UI that can significantly accelerate the development of Firebase Genkit Flows by enabling local testing. However, when integrating with other Firebase products, such as Firestore or Cloud
Read more
YouTube
Imagen image generation - Release Notes Deep Dive
In this deep dive, Alexander Nohe takes a look at Imagen for image generation and presents a challenge to those viewers to come up with a prompt for generating their own images. Learn more about Imagen and the Vertex AI SDKs here: Chapters:
0:20 -
View video
Trusted by the largest apps and games
Development teams around the world—including NPR, Halfbrick, Duolingo, and Venmo—use Firebase to build and ship their modern apps.
Common use cases
Use Firebase products together to solve complex app development challenges and optimize your app experience. Learn how to personalize your onboarding flow, grow user engagement, or add new functionality with Firebase.
View solutions
Info
Chat
Sub-policy 6
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps